It's not garbage, its fear mongering.
Actually, it's nice to have a new idea too, especially when you say stuff about how your thing is gonna do for the web what the Mac did for the personal computer. If there was any evidence of that kind of thing to be smelled anywhere, I think you'd find a little more willingness to wait and see on the execution.
I've read them, and they are not that funny. I would suggest you go to bash.org and read top 100, those are much better.
If you look at a lot of these changes, they are really extracted refinements rather than bloating additions. They aim at making things more DRY and eliminating workarounds that used to be more clumsy. So while the Rails API may gain a few methods, it will actually make the programmer's experience using Rails more consistent and streamlined. The beauty of a framework like rails is that you can use it without leveraging its full api - go ahead and write your stuff 'old skool' in 15 lines of code, and a few days later, you'll look over that code and you'll slash it down to a mere 3-4 lines using a rails method you've just discovered - it's a lot of fun. DHH said somewhere that Rails 1.0 should have been 2.0, because he doesn't see a lot of major additions any time soon. He's wisely pushed 'higher level' functionality (like login systems, etc.) into generators, plugins, engines, whatnot, to keep the framework uncluttered. Rails is walking the line between high level convenience and low level flexibility better than any other framework I've ever used.
That's true, but who else would?
High school drop out does good
They put the power switch and all of the connections in the back?  Or is that the front?
手元のiCalでも化けていたので、記事の通りに対処した。
or, download the [bugmenot extension](http://reddit.com/info?id=23yu)...
there's some confusion as of late (http://features.reddit.com/info?id=27b9) as to what the voting up/down means.  Voting up may mean, for example, that you are glad reddit directed you to the article/site/etc.  It doesn't necessarily mean that you agreed with the post, for example.
I do.  See the comment of user theycallmemorty.  Don't you think that the hide/show feature is broken if it causes the recommended page to show nonsense (when set to show)?  Or the other way round: is it the purpose of this feature to be a workaround for a broken recommendation page?
what exactly is infogami?   and if it isn't done yet, can it morph into something completely radically life-altering?  hmmm.. i wonder. congrats to aaron and others involved. 
平面上の位置、および押す強さ(?)によって操作するMIDIコントローラ。弾く姿は大正琴のよう。
I love the last sentence:  "The only question left to answer is this: who valued this painting at $1.5 Million?" 
maybe he thought the painting looked like chewed up chewing gum and tried to show a similarity by a side-by-side (or rather top) analysis?
I've done this.  It's cool. 
Open your wife's car door!!
While this is interesting - it's hardly groundbreaking. in this vein: people posted in South Africa used to do have to come up with strategies to get money outside the country. Under the law it was illegal to extract money. So people used to use a strategy which I've heard called 'offset pricing'. You'd go to someone involved in international trade with an office in South Africa. You'd make an arrangement with them to pay them an amount of money which you would later withdraw in another country in which they had an offiec. And then they'd manage the transition within their company. Of course, there'd be a margin you'd need to pay to make it worth their while. 
So I can't go pick one up tonight at an Apple Store?  Oh well, the malls are closing in about 15 minutes anyway ;-) Didn't they used to have products all ready to sell at the stores when Jobs did his big announcements?  Any idea why they don't do that anymore?
photo shop
I thought it was pretty well established that the peasant diet was not, in fact, particularly healthy relative to the diet of the hunter-gatherers they out-reproduced.  But I suppose the analogy holds, since poor peasants likely weren't prone to obesity.
I don't get it, why is this in the request sub?
In fact its is a VERY well done clip. Who has the time, the SKILL and taste to create that clip on a whim?   
I don't think anybody honestly thinks that a mix is good. It just creates problems. Luckily most editors can convert tabs to spaces when you hit the tab key. IDLE, the included IDE does this and auto-indentation.
The trouble with Infogami is that it doesn't have a "big idea". The Mac's "big idea" was GUI for the masses.  Infogami needed some core feature that made people think "Wow. That makes creating a site an order of magntiude easier than anything before."  The Mac was a revolution - Infogami is just a me-too wiki service.
I'm worried that you'll spend your valuable time, money, and energy on infogami. I'd much rather you pour your efforts into Reddit.
Fun, sun...and pencil and paper
Now that you've got an RSS expert on staff, how about slurping up postings from popular blogs (with the authors' permission) and making each into a reddit? For example, Bruce Schneier's Crypto-gram has too much traffic these days -- now that Reddit has lowered my attention span, i don't like sifting through all the mediocre posts each time i want to catch up with the good ones. It would be real nice if i could just go to cryptogram.reddit.com and see a ranked listing of all the posts i haven't run Hide on.
Wow... it has speech recognition built in. Mac OS got that in **1993**! Of course, it'll never crash or get viruses... didn't they say that about XP too? Until they prove otherwise, I'm inclined to think this is pure hype.
LOL:ITMOTN (In the Middle of the Night - that's quite an achievement)
Maybe kill the ads on this one?
I have a hard time believing that a Y-Combinator startup would have a lack of applicants.  And my guess is that there was an applicant or two who'd fit the bill. Partnering with reddit is still a good idea.
dupe
can someone explain this mystery in laymans terms? If the Homer Simpson quote is supposed to explain counterfactual computation, why is it good?
Boy, that looks easy to fake. Too bad we didn't get to see him get into that position.
Says my girlfriend, a former art conservator's assistant: Luckily saliva is not harmful to paintings and is actually used when cleaning them sometimes. The gum is another story.
follow the 4 p's  Passionate - Write about issues that are near and dear to your heart  Purposeful - Make sure you keep the end in mind; why are you blogging?  Present - Keep an eye on what’s topical today  Positional - Take a stand on an issue and follow it
i found it at programming.reddit.com
Most organizations have a sweetspot. That's the product or service that leads to highest profit, retention, customer satisfaction and word of mouth.
The article is incorrect.  Dantzig solved a problem that was posted along with homework assignments.  He solved the problem at home at leisure.  It was not part of a test.
They need to make money. Give them a break.
Interesting. I'd learned the "use your arm, not your fingers" tip in the context of sketching, but I never thought to apply it to writing.  The same concept's also important for piano technique. Instead of walking up and down the keyboard with your fingers, you should be moving your arms and, incidentally, making hand poses.
see http://reddit.com/info?id=291e
Didn't you hear?  Money is smarter than you.  Definition of capitalism.
Coincides with Bush's visit to India - usually you see a bunch of feel good stories that are PR plants. Hmm, the submarine again ...
生成されるのが平易な英文じゃないのがちょっと惜しい。けど使えるかも。
I looked up the definition and I was definitely wrong. I thought there was a negative connotation in the word, but if there is, it isn't universal.
Reddit is Google's marketing tool.  This is all advertising for [Google Page Creator](http://pages.google.com).
"the energy **will** be supplied by small super batteries, located in a thin layer of the watch. In the nearest future such technology **will** be popular and not expensive." Translation -- it doesn't exist yet.
I signed up 3 or 4 days ago, and still haven't got let in.
I just found it an interesting fact that mine is literally *the only positive comment* on a story that 142 people liked.
this is a valid point. if you dont want the ads use firefox &amp; ad remove plugin.... but if they dont make any revenue the site will fold. Takes your poison.
You mean, a negative connotation to "adherents"? Interesting, I've never seen that in my experience.
This is cool. I added some stuff to the side bar.
This is a repeat. But I'm upvoting it anyway. 
Seconded. Even from a user perspective, it's nice to have an easy way to see the comments, and to be able to cite one's sources. If you don't push your own permalink, who will? One possible compromise is to have RSS links open in the reddit frame.
I saw "What the bleep" with some friends - that's the only reason I didn't walk out. It was clearly crazy - a little googling connected it with the cult/sect surrounding Ramtha http://skepdic.com/channel.html
i submit plenty of sports articles. they're pretty good.
1. Give each user a private RSS feed URL that shows the most up-to-date list of recommendations/hot links for that user while hiding pages just like the corresponding reddit pages. Suitably hashed URL for security. (Is this terribly server-intensive?) 2. Make each link in the RSS feed open in the reddit frame, making it easy to hide links and in turn update the RSS feed. ------  Using RSS might even help modulate reddit addiction :)
&gt; The pyparsing grammar shown will parse not only Hello, World! but also any of:  &gt;  &gt; * Hey, Jude!  &gt; * Hi, Mom!  &gt; * G'day, Mate!  &gt; * Yo, Adrian!  &gt; * Howdy, Pardner!  &gt; * Whattup, Dude! And also any of: * Later, hosers!  * Heh, heh!  * Oh, shit!  * Really, enough!  * Airspeed, unladen! :)
harass, v.t 1. To irritate or torment persistently. 2. To wear out; exhaust. 3. To impede and exhaust (an enemy) by repeated attacks or raids.  http://dictionary.reference.com/search?r=2&amp;q=harassment Notice the emphasis on _repeated_. If the cops suddenly blow open your door one day and tell you to spread your legs and get on the floor, that's not harassment. They're allowed to occasionally make a mistake. How airports treat passengers, now that is arguably harassment.
wish rest of the world follows
The headline misses the point that you can use any SISC-based (Scheme) web framework that might come along on any J2EE host.
this is very true. i was talking to a friend about this at a party. alcohol is just an excuse to act in a particular desirable manner. it's actually kind of sad that people don't act the way they _really_ want to all the time. i know i am often guilty of this. (often we spend so much time assessing risk or how to maneuver in an illusionary world that we construct for ourselves.)
I think the article is more realistic.  "800 million Indians make less than $2 a day"
In other news:  "Living is fatal, an American scientist found"
These are like geek koans. I love it.
Oh man loved the soundtrack. Pee Wee Herman...brings back memories...
Think of Wikipedia. The whole reason it's any good is because anyone who's motivated can fix typos, add a few words, clear something up... Reddit could harness that too, especially for the more permanent sections of the site (features.reddit.com), but also for the less permanent (reddit.com)
I have no idea what you're trying to say.
I guess layering stuff is new for classical musicians? I suppose he does get a lot of different sounds out of it.
NO, I like GWB.  Why single him out?   What happened to the rest of the intellectuals in the administration?
nice article on filesystems running in user address space
absolutely brilliant and right on target!
Clearly he was expressing post-industrial ennui manifested as a metaphysical dialogue. In becoming a psychosocial mediator between producers and consumers of culture, he embodies Baudrillaude's celebrated notion of a self-deterministic actor.
Dang, didn't notice the font
Nicely done.
NBC DCMAed the file off youtube.  Mirror here:  http://www.yourfilelink.com/get.php?fid=34616
some time back I read programming = poetry and specification = novel
An Asian based Blog Site which lists the Best Blogs in Asia and free to submit to.
You cannot obey all laws, since some of them contradict others.  You must choose, as an individual, which laws you will obey, even if you would prefer to obey all of them.
Indeed, the ads aren't obtrusive, and on a site where things I like are concentrated, Google ads are more often actually things I want to look at (as opposed to sites without such a bias toward my interests).
Simple Struts Tutorial !!
Linode 160 - $39.95/month  160M RAM, 6GB disk, 100GB xfer What is this BS?  $40/mo for access to 6GB of disk?!?! That's about $4 worth of hardware or the same as renting a $20,000 car for $200,000/mo.  Except the car will actually show some wear after a month of use.
This takes quite a bit of the plumbing out of writing an Ajax application. Now you can just create a standard web service on the server, and then use this JS code to automatically consume it.
Eesh. Maybe tags *would* be better...
If you really think the bash.org top 100 is the epitome of hilarity, you might consider having your sense of humor surgically replaced.
Amazing that the exact same link (http://reddit.com/info?id=x76) was voted down to -6 earlier this week.
They did that with the iPod Shuffle. Jobs announced that they were on sale immediately a few blocks away. There was a mad rush of RDF victims who ran directly accross the street and handed over as many $100 bills as the Apple Store would take from them. They might do it with other products too. Dunno.
名古屋工業大学
Website for sale, great explanation
Plus he made a neat little video.
Certainly looks interesting
It's called tact, and it's pretty essential for social survival.
I'm not familiar with these "decorator" things. Could someone please confirm that: - This hack operates at runtime, not compile-time. - It does not work for mutually recursive functions. - It avoids stack overflows, but does not improve performance (except maybe through cache locality effects). - python's implementation of exceptions does not allocate memory (this might offset the benefits of tail-call elimination). 
Washington Postとdel.icio.usのmashup
how sad
About 3 categories of the internet business to buy. Simple approach. use http://www.ibdeal.com/evaluator to get a better idea
&gt;  77% said they also believe the main or a major reason for the war was “to stop Saddam from protecting al Qaeda in Iraq.” Oh the irony. The former Baathist Regime of Saddam and other dictators in the region have proven to be quite effective at crushing insurgent fundamentalist groups of the al Qaeda variety, as such groups are logistically a more immediate threat to them than to the West. While Israel and the US might be the Muslim fundamentalist rallying cry on al Jazeera, they rail against other regimes in the region, their favorite being the House of Saud.  The worst tactics used by the U.S. military, either condoned or not, do not stand up to the effectiveness of a regime that has no qualms about exterminating entire families, tribes or even villages to get to insurgents. Now we got al Qaeda, al Qaeda wannabe's, and sectarian al Qaeda posers running around Iraq, inspiring the pissed off and unemployed arab youth of the region. Infidel hunting enthusiasts are growing exponentially. "We'll take the fight to them." Yeah, good idea George.
Just press SPACE when the annoying 'This content is copyright protected' pops up when you press the right mouse button. Then release the mouse button.
This is the first article i've read on this site, i hope they are all as entertaining as that!
Des Bds simples en noir et blanc, un humour efficace,  j'adore !!
Hooray for programming reddit. Already a new lease of life has been breathed.
Whilst reddit's sorting method is a good mix of votes and age of post, this isn't always useful.  Especially when viewing search results and one isn't concerned with the timeliness or topicality.  What about: number of votes, number of up votes, relevance of a particular keyword in the search terms, precedence to higher ranked submitters, etc.  It'd be nice to have this kind of flexibility.
Don't the first and fourth point pretty much invalidate the whole article. Given that we're on 2.4 and 2.3 is prevalent.
They also have a reasonably priced ebook store, but unfortunately only a small percentage of the books available there don't pander to young libertarians. Fortunately it's pretty easy to spot those writers.
Friends, why can't we come together and reach a compromise: it's fearmongering garbage.  (Bill Hicks: "Boy, I've never seen a issue so divisive. It's like a civil war, isn't it? Even amongst my friends, who are all very intelligent; they're totally divided on abortion. It's unbelievable. Some of my friends, for instance, think these pro-life people are annoying idiots. Other of my friends think these pro-life people ... are evil fucks. How are we going to come to a consensus? You wanna the arguments around my house: 'They're annoying, they're idiots.' 'They're evil, they're fucks!' Brothers, sisters, come together! Can't we once just join hands and think of them as evil-annoying-idiot-fucks? I beseech you. But that's me ...")
It sucks, but that's what we have to use for our time tracking. Being able to do that one task from Linux without any special effort would be great.
California's governor left his SUV out in a hail storm and wound up with a real dinged hummer ;)
No surprise.  Also not as flavorful.   
Denne for eksempel. Veldig lite givende. Derfor minus. Andre "nyheter" som har blitt stemt ned på den amerikanske, orginale varianten er: "vanlig" dags-presse stoff. Sport. Religion (i hvert fall for det meste). Vold. Sex. Hollywood film. Gossip. Kommersielle sider for gamle produkter (med mindre siden eller presentasjon i selv er interssant (f.eks. Honda's bil reklame med et acapella-kor)). Eller en annen tommelfinger regel: Hvis tema du poster om kan diskuteres ferdig mens du betaler for pølse i brød på Esso, er den sannsynligvis ikke interessant her (f.eks. "\tBestemor angrep krokodille "). 
Gossip / dagspresse = minus
Gossip, Dagspresse = minus
Duplicate = minus. (Denne er posten nok na...)
they said it about XP, about 2000 and about Me.  The only thing that will be more secure is your money in their bank account :-)   
&gt;"We'll take the fight to them." Yeah, good idea George. He's a puppet. Who's the puppet master? Paul Wolfiwitz? Frank Carlucci? James Baker?
pretty damn useless
It's just teasing.
One of the reasons the food is so good here in Italy is that the ingredients aren't shitty. Tomatoes are red, juicy, and taste like a tomato should.  The price you pay for that is that you do see more spoiled vegetables and fruit at the supermarket, instead of row upon row of "perfect" veggies. I think here, they still select for high quality rather than durability in shipping, resistance to spoilage and other things like that.
Except that closures are more than anonymous methods. ;)
Seems more like he hates the result of people using them in situations where something simpler would do. So when is a good time to use a design pattern?
Little Smalltalk が Java VM ベースに。
メモリ空間に応用できないか。
The arrows are the _only_ information you need to make a good recommendation.  The problem with the current recomendation engine, it seems, it that it uses _more_ information than the arrows, which actually makes it worse.  Having a centralized in queue for links is also wrong, punishing people for providing links is wrong, and subreddits are wrong.  They all try to fix somthing that should be fix _inside_ the recommendation algorithm.
つらつら…は載っていない。orz
まだなのかよっ！とお約束なのでつっこんでおく。
Smalltalk が初のマルチウインドウやポップアップメニュー、マルチフォントこそまだないけれど、マウス操作、ハイパーリンク、白黒反転表示のオリジンがここに。
静止画なのにじわーっと動いて見える不思議絵。
アラン・ケイ名言集。意外と LISP 好き？
This is part of the reason we have taken to growing our own veggies. The garden is expanding this year and we are looking to put in some fruit and nut bearing trees. Suburban homesteading at its best.
HELP! CHINA! HELP! ISLAM! AAAAH! OIL! NOOOOOO! BIRD FLU!
ちょっと前に話題になってたタッチパネルのムービーが発表された会議についてのHOTWIREDの記事。
I try to use them where they reduce complexity and/or enhance communication. A class named TransactionVisitor communicates more about its purpose and responsibility than TransactionManager or TransactionHandler. I don't think it's helpful to bash patterns because many developers misuse them.
that seems to be a terminology confusion on behalf of whoever named this part of C#; the demonstrated example does seem to implement actual closures. (it doesn't exactly stress-test anything, though, so who knows what devils may be in those details...)
WTO, Trilateral Commission, World Bank, Council of Foreign Affairs ...?
I think I'll hang up a blank canvas, encourgae kids to put gum on it, call it art, and sell it for millions!
He implements a Singleton (something to avoid!), a Factory (something unneeded in Ruby due to Duck Typing - and evidence of Ruby's power as it doesn't need to go out of it's way to implement a Factory), and a Visitor/Iterator. I think this particular article is weak due to the examples, but if he expanded it to some further patterns, it could be really useful. It's short, so it's certainly worth a read.
They should just randomly overtake each other, being careful to stay under  the speed limit at all times.  Then they'd be following the letter of the  law about staying on the right except to pass.  Some motorists might get by  them, but their blocking effect would still be substantial. - Rujith. 
i wonder what it's like to be under 21 and past your prime.
This was great! Anyone who falls for this stunt DESERVES to spend too much money on a condo. The staged neighbors were over-the-top!  LMAO!
This made me laugh out loud!
It's not a shared-host situation where you have an account on a big webserver, it's a virtual host situation where you have complete control of the (virtual) machine and can install or configure whatever you want, and use it for any number of internet services. And it's generally a heck of a lot cheaper than a colocation setup, where you buy the actual machine and host it somewhere.
the reduce() example is a strawman.  nobody sane would use reduce() to emulate sum()
yes, runtime. about mutual recursion, it will screw up any kind of recursion other than straight tail calls.  in that sense, it's not a tail call optimizer but a recursion eliminator that only happens to work for tail calls.  it will most likely fail silently if you try anything else. improve performance compared to what?  compared to a for loop?  nope.  compared to 1000 recursive calls without the decorator?  yes. the last point confuses me.  objects take up memory.  creating objects allocates memory.  python has a garbage collector
11. Avoid typos
Let's see a reputable source on this, please.
Hva med å få disse "dette synes jeg" artiklene som denne, uten noen faktisk link, ned til et minimum? Hvis du vil gi poeng til artikler du liker, uavhengig av hvor de ble publisert, så gjør du det. Hvis jeg ikke vel det, så gjør jeg ikke det.
Same here, and it's not about Firefox, IE doesn't display it either...
his tactics remind me of ender's game.
When taken too far, its called social anxiety. The point sudoman was probably making was that the calculations get in the way of what could be a simple and good social move.  Alcohol supposedly lowers our inhibitions, or maybe it just lets us lower our inhibitions because we think thats how we should be when we are drunk, and its too bad everyone can't just lower their inhibitions at will. oh well, I need a drink.
Charities mentioned in the article: - [Global Giving](http://www.globalgiving.com/) - [Kiva](http://www.kiva.org/) Pretty cool ways to do charity... 
That's a pretty succinct way of explaining how capitalism doesn't serve people's best interests.
It's amazing how effectively Cheney has implemented the Big Lie technique.
Jeg tror du har misforstatt poenget her. Reddit gir deg og meg artiklene vi interesserer oss for. Sa man slipper a lese gjennom masse skit.
Junk = minus.
See also:  ["For God's Sake: Please stop the aid!"](http://reddit.com/search?q=For+God%27s+Sake%2C+Please+Stop+the+Aid%21)
Noen som har gratis .no registering, eller lite a bruke penger pa? Eventuelt, er det en bizzar reklame for Domeneshop?
I got it too, though earlier I was able to view it in Safari. The article mentioned a blog and the blog author has a post about it, but I can't locate that because I forgot what the name of the blog was.
舞台のSE再生に使われている機材らしい。鍵盤やキーボードなどでも行えるが、専用機の方が安心できるのかもしれない。
Det hadde vert ok med litt mer beskrivende tittel.
Here's a cache: http://search.villagevoice.com/search?q=cache:pERKO8MDWugJ:www.villagevoice.com/nyclife/0609,sylvester,72342,15.html+Do+You+Wanna+Kiss+Me&amp;access=p&amp;output=xml_no_dtd&amp;ie=UTF-8&amp;client=village_voice&amp;site=VillageVoice&amp;oe=UTF-8&amp;proxystylesheet=village_voice
Vedder pa at den bruker 5 liter pa mila!! :)
I am skeptical of the stuff that they post on damninteresting.com.  This is in large part because they claimed that the &lt;a href="http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Phantom_time_hypothesis"&gt;Phantom Time Hypothesis&lt;/a&gt; was somehow credible.
I wonder how organic fruits and veggies stack up.
click on the link. Interesting how nobody does that on features.reddit anymore.
Yes, it was recently rewritten and there are some bugs still. The most obvious is that it isn't updating properly. We will be fixing that this evening.
Remind anyone of that Wile E. Coyote cartoon where he dons the "Bat Suit"?
Much better in [free verse](http://www.catb.org/jargon/html/story-of-mel.html).   
"I want something good to die for; to make it beautiful to live." Queens of the Stone Age, Go With the Flow
I'm intrigued by the idea. I already use Mediawiki extensively as a content management tool on several non-wiki sites... an elegant union of the unstructured text with revision saving of a wiki and the dated syndicated content of a blog? It could be huge. Of course, because the ideas are not particularly new, it'll be all in the implementation.
What is this British network doing talking about American ignorance?  American TV networks don't run stories about their bad teeth.
That has to be accidental... :-/
To put it real simply: for some things alcohol helps, for some it hurts. Don't try programing drunk- unless you like piles of worthless code, don't pick up ladies while (completely) sober- unless you like the feeling of getting shot down. As far as the placebo affect goes, this *study* is of terribly poor quality.
Exactly.  This website also contains an article titled "Ancient Egyptian Treasures In The Grand Canyon?"
makes sense, but which id are you talking about?
Here is a repost:  http://groups.google.com/group/alt.seduction.fast/msg/1ed905510172e22d?
thank you...  ps.  See also http://www.paulperry.net/notes/acf_sql.asp for a nice overview of k-NN collaborative filtering.  KISS applies for all things, and I could see how a social component to Reddit's filtering might increase the value of the enterprise (for our slower readers, that means "you should be acquired by Amazon within the year unless you fuck up"). Great site, some minor goofs but lovely execution overall.  I enjoy checking it every day.  Be careful if Amazon comes knocking though, they're slave drivers.  Ask for enough money so that you won't feel bad if you need to quit. 
Article summarized: **Busted drug maker claims scientist used LSD.  Scientist denies it.**
Help!!! He's influencing me!!!
With Cam Wizard it's possible to set up a multiple camera CCTV audio/video surveillance system with motion detection in a matter of seconds.
That shot is by Mark Nichols from Newfoundland, the third on Team Canada.  If there was such as thing as an MVP in curling tourneys,  it was him. He curled at 97% in the gold medal game.
One day, these people are going to be (rightfully) pissed when they figure out that we deceived them, toying with their lives so casually for so little reason.
Nice use of Infogami.
Perhaps so, but that's no excuse. He has both the power and the duty to do what's right.  The fact that he is too lazy, spineless, and/or detached from reality to do so is not a mitigating factor.
True.  But the important point is that his approval rating is both the lowest that it's ever been, and lower than any president since his father (yes, lower than Clinton).  To go back to a president with significantly lower approval rating, you'd have to go back to Carter in 1979 (ie: 18% inflation).
http://kiko.com/ shows the "Plesk Default Page".
if you're reading comments first... before you read the article, can YOU name the 5 rights the 1st amendment ensures? it's really not that easy unless you are in elementary school.
see also: [wikipedia](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Francis_Crick#Reactions_to_Crick_and_his_Work) [transcript from the series Thinking Allowed](http://www.intuition.org/txt/crick2.htm)
Funny that the url is "impact lab".
Heh. FastSeduction.com is so three years ago. Learning this shit now is like seeking VC for a horse &amp; buggy startup. The signal to noise ration in the forums has gone to shit, the same way it happened in the poker usenet groups once that Matt Damon movie came out. Seduction has officially stopped being hip and started being cool.
Sure. HTML is a "progra**M**ming **L**anguage" because the "L" stands for language.
I still think it is a dumb event.   
I do too, but at the same time, whenever it is on I always sit and watch.  It's strangely compelling.
And people would use this instead of MySpace or [insert favorite blog software here], why? And don't say "it's for a different demographic" unless you've got one in mind that's not people who already have a personal web page, or people who don't want one.
what a dupe. http://reddit.com/info?id=19304
check out the Band Names you Never Heard of!
That was two months ago.  Give him a break.
[es.reddit.com](http://reddit.com) has Spanish links.  If there are any other languages that you'd like to see a reddit for, just [email us](mailto:feedback@reddit.com).
I don't know if this is really worth mentioning, but my parents are planning a trip to Norway right now... should I warn them about the trolls? ;-)
if they air the 1st amendment constantly on television, and my friends and i keep tapping the 1st amendment for inside jokes and references, then by golly i think i would remember it too!
Not *my* money, but I'm sure they'll have plenty of just about everyone else's.
Anyone want to nominate this guy for a Darwin award ?
Uhm... didn't they just unban 'allah'?
It's sad how many people consider Wikipedia to be a reputable source, espcially given the fact that I can edit an article to match my claim just before saying, "Look, Wikipedia says its true!".
I WANT women who can pick up on this stuff and still decide to go along with it, if I can come up with original things to express myself with. As long as we're having a tense kind of fun.
Drugs are meant to be prescribed only when depression is clinical, ie when chemical imbalances exist in the brain, causing irrational anxiety and depression which are not entirely derived from circumstances in the sufferer's life. In the US, though, it's pretty easy to get a xanax prescription or the like if you give an account which sounds vaguely as though you have some kind of irrational anxiety, even if that's not really the case.  I agree that drugs then become merely devices for escaping the realities of life, rather than for dealing with a true problem.
reddit has ads? where?
...which brings me to the point that reddit should do a source comparison with previous submissions and provide possible duplicate links to the submitter so that they can make their own educated decision on the matter. It shouldn't be too hard to develop an algorithm to extract the rarest words and store them for matching purposes later.
But ... why?
not bad, but there's almost too many opmls there !
the wikipedia link just notes the rumour, does not attempt to confirm it. the thinking aloud transcript is the interesting thing, Crick at least confirms his interest in LSD, and expresses some thoughts on it.
&gt; His code was not easy for someone else to modify Possibly the understatement of the year.
Maybe not all 5 but speech, religion and press should be known by most Americans
Most of the articles under the "top" tab are excellent.. Check those out..
Nice article. But the funny thing is a web page with javascript tutorial gives a javascript error in ie. Managers dont buy it.
This provokes my curling mockery even more! Teh Gay!  (you people have no good sense of humor or taste)
Searching Reddit for "The story of Mel, a real programmer" (currently) shows the duplicated post as the fifth hit. Reddit could probably cut down significantly on the number of accidental duplicates by searching on the title as well as the contents of an optional "dup search" field, then showing the submitter the top results of the search and asking them to confirm (or not confirm) the submission. It's not a significant extra nuisance; in fact it makes things more convenient for conscientious submitters, who will usually do one or two searches before they submit anyway.
There *is* no "source TeX or whatever"; that's why it is the way it is.  It's from when publishers went off and did weird things with what you gave them.
If by "accidental", you mean "exactly what they planned on happening". Not an easy shot, but definitely what they planned. Last rock of the end, it was the only thing to try (if I remember correctly).
No that's definitely not enough. "A real programmer he was" wasn't even close enough for me to merit clicking on the link. I'm not going to go through every other submission with "real" and "programmer" in it. I really think a keyword comparison of the whole document is a better solution.
This author has obviously not seen the nature show filming monkeys eating fruit that they intentionally allowed to ferment.  Unless the placebo effect holds with monkeys, this article is mostly bs.  The monkeys where wasted and acted wasted. Alcohol lowers inhibitions.  This is good some of the time and bad at other times.  If you are looking for a mate, it can be good in moderate quantities.  If you are getting up the nerve to fight someone or to drown your murderous compulsions, then it is bad.
Absolutely, search on the body too. It would still make sense to add a (completely optional) "dup search" field, allowing the would-be submitter can make his/her own guesses at some distinctive terms from the submitted article.
This is technically called rational ignorance.  It doesn't make economic sense to spend time learning the constitution unless you have an additional reason, like it's for your job or hobby or pride.
Best section of the article: "Google, for example, says its mission is 'to organize the world's information and make it universally accessible and useful.' The way that's written, one thinks perhaps of a satellite orbiting high above the earth, capturing all its information but interfering with nothing. In fact, search engines are more like a TV camera crew let loose in the middle of a crowd of rowdy fans after a game. Seeing the camera, everyone acts boorishly and jostles to get in front. The act of observing something changes it."
CCNY, Carlyle Group, PNAC ...?
triple duped
No fairy cakes where harmed in the making of this movie.
Well, if you begin submitting links to his blog posts, then two things would happen: 1) Reddit will find out, that you like his blog posts, and 2) People will find out that they also like his blog and begin posting links, so you don't have to. Why don't you take the initiative?  Are you afraid of loosing karma?
But that's a different (if related) question, yes? (BTW, I wasn't suggesting that you aren't a conscientious submitter or that you didn't search before submitting.) We've both proposed that Reddit should do a search for possible dupes, using some broader criteria than identical URLs, and display the (top X) search results to the would-be submitter before (s)he confirms the submission. The new question you've raised is: how should Reddit display those search results? The Reddit search I mentioned does pretty well at finding the dup - it came in #5 - but even if the search had put the dup at #1 you probably still wouldn't have picked it up as such from its title. So maybe the search results should include some additional information about each hit displayed, not just its title and URL*. A short list of distinctive words from the hit might indeed be a good window into the content; the first few words from the body (in the manner of gmail/google web search) might be quite effective too. (* And score, submitter and sub date.)
True.  Especially about this vacuum cleaner :)
"The poll, conducted in conjunction with Le Moyne College’s Center for Peace and Global Studies" Oh my, no chance of bias (rigged questions, etc.) there, right?
Thanks.  I had written that for an internal wiki and turned it loose on infogami.  It helped that mediawiki's markup and Markdown were similar enough to make the transition fairly easy :) If you want to see something neat then check this out.  http://javascript.infogami.com/_history/sidebar
KNOWLEDGE = POWER : TIME = MONEY : POWER = WORK / TIME :: (Substituting equivalent terms) KNOWLEDGE = WORK / MONEY :: (Solving for MONEY) MONEY = WORK / KNOWLEDGE  :: as KNOWLEDGE   -&gt; 0, MONEY -&gt; [infinity] :: The less you know, the more you earn, QED.
Very typical 'science' article.  Take an interesting study, blow its conclusions way out of proportion, generate controversy, get attention.  Asses.
On hard problems: has Church-Turing hypothesis (the one about equivalence of four models of computation) been already proved?  We all know that there are Lisp interpreters working on the top of computers based on RAM machine model, but was the possibility of defining lambda calculus on RAM machine solved theoretically?
good comedy
At what point does daredevil brilliance become self-ridiculing, breathless stupidity? I can't define it, but at least I have one good example...
I definitely will still be mocking curling.  A cool shot, but come on! It's like someone got the rules for bowling, billard and ice hockey mixed up and just decided to go with it.
Women are on to this bullshit?  Good.  That increases the pool of women I deem smart enough to ever have anything to do with.
Speech, religion, press, petition the government for a redress of greivances... After checking them, those are all right.  I only missed the Freedom of Assembly.
Natural selection, ain't it a bitch!
You're missing one key point. If you participate in Curling, you HAVE to drink. It's socially unacceptable not to. So... bowling, billiards, ice hockey, and college DRINKING GAMES all mixed together.  Of course, you drink before and after the game, not during. But still... And as for the shot, I watched the game, and that was the best shot but not by much. He (Nichols) was throwing brilliantly and there were a few other stunner shots. The really cool thing about curling, though, is that your abilities don't degrade nearly as much with age as most other sports - lots of 80 year olds are very very solid curlers. 
Granted, that shot was amazing, and I watched it about 10 times.  But enough to end my mockery of curling?  I think not.  If curling is going to be an event, how about bowling and shuffleboard?  What about Card-house making?  They all seem to take about the same amount of athletic prowess.  Though bowling does seem to have the extra requirement of a beer gut...
Right now I have 313 likes, and 436 dislikes, and I just voted 50% of the top ten recommended links down (the other half was voted up).  How many votes are needed to give a good prediction?
Genial!
I'm curious to know how well the British know their own constitution.
I don't always think that Phillip Greenspun has the best chain of logic, but somehow he arrives at the correct (and often depressing) conclusion.
&gt; while the hit rate has soared four times on the first day, there has been no increase in the number of comments or substantial increase in the number of viewers viewing anything other than the front page So he basis all of this on his one site? Guess what, content is king and maybe no one wants to read 90% of your blog garbage. Then again, what about the advertising boost you got for the increased traffic to the advertisements on your page? Lets see numbers from a sample size &gt; 1.
Unfortunately, TFA's author seems to be correct. Well, that's why I'll start interviewing in my junior or senior year of undergrad.  Oh, well.
Clarifying the last point: It is OK to allocate memory for the exception object. But what I am concerned about is the "try" construct itself. In some language implementations, each "try" consumes memory, to keep track of which exceptions are caught by which handlers. This can be a problem when doing recursion. 
I haven't read it, but what the heck does "Adjusted for IQ" mean?
"You had defender in colour? When I was your age, it was green and black, and we loved it!"
Sounds like AFC talk to me. (I'm joking, relax, you can play one on me next time :) )
Quantum effects at work? On a global scale?
Fixed.  Some angle brackets were not escaped as entities.
This is, in a nutshell, why sites like reddit are valuable. 
The PBS special on this claims he figured it out because he had some kind of x-ray photos done by a woman who never got any credit.
Wow.  I heard of the million-dollar page but didn't know it was successful. Um, I'll be eating soup for dinner again.  It was on sale this week.   I'll be fine.  Here's [proof](http://mudd.homeip.net/soup1.jpg).  And [more proof](http://mudd.homeip.net/soup2.jpg).
&gt; they told him it was possible that someone else on the bus looked suspicious, and they wanted to scare him. this law doesn't even exist. the closest law to this involves actually operating a vehicle, and not riding the bus. The important part of the story is that the cop made up the law for some reason.
This is really, really, old. I remember using this five years ago.
You could try reading it.
He definitely hand-waves past some important stuff sometimes. But I didn't really see that here.
It means that you compare the salaries of women with IQ=150 who are scientists, not to the general population (IQ=100), but to women with IQ=150.  Likewise, you compare women with IQ=80 to women with IQ=80.  The unstated assumption is that women who are scientists tend to have higher IQ.  So it's unfair to compare them to the general population, since IQ is somewhat proportional to salary (one would hope).  Does that help, or were you joking?
I am not even from your country and I can tell that speech and press are among them.
Greenspun always includes Mathematics as a field of study to avoid.  Paul Graham mentions it as a degree that leaves you with a strong hand with plenty of options, many of them lucrative, ex. derivitives trader on Wall Street.  Who is right?  I'd like to give competent advice to smart young people.
Nothing new.  Read Heraclite.  Fetch infos about the 'TRIZ' method.
He means that scientists who often have a high IQ and level of motivation or discipline ought to be making more money and have securer jobs by standards of those well-paid people with similarly high or even lower IQ and lev. of mot. or disc. in other fields. also that smart women are often too smart to choose such an unrewarding career.
That guy is morally on one level with those islamic extremists he is condemning in the quote in the article.  Forcing other people (e.g. children born in a town like that, they have no choice) to live according to your laws is never good, especially not if those laws are arbitary and there is no proof that without those laws people would be harmed in some major way.
That guy is morally on one level with those islamic extremists he is condemning in the quote in the article.  Forcing other people (e.g. children born in a town like that, they have no choice) to live according to your laws is never good, especially not if those laws are arbitary and there is no proof that without those laws people would be harmed in some major way.
Haha I guess I wasn't quite clear. I was trying to illustrate the differences between being hip and being cool. Basically things are hip when they are practiced by early adopters, and become cool when they transition into practice by everyone else. The iPod was hip two years ago, now the iPod is cool. I was saying the fastseduction.com community has transitioned from being hip to being cool, but you would have to know that Strass's book was based on that website to understand what I was saying I guess. Also the poker reference was to how Rounders made poker really popular, so that now there are all these kids going around playing poker and watching the world poker tour and stuff.
Who made that one?  Locke? 
Even if it would be 5% the number would still be too high.
And here's why:  * they go terribly with the scheme.   * its very distracting to have along side the comments. Does slashdot, osnews, lte, or much any other large site have it setup like this? nope   * if you have to keep pictures then we're just going to have to be able to post pictures in the comments to balance it out;) So, what I'm saying is that it would be much better if you made the adds monochrome in your stylesheet and didn't use graphical adds. Maybe you not use picture adds on comment sections that only have a few comments on them? This is where they're most distracting.
Why have people do all that labor when the computer could do it for them? Someone like Bruce makes a post, it automatically shows up on Reddit, people who like the blogger see his posts on Recommended, and everything just automatically happens.
Whoops.  Might be fabricated:  http://www.gawker.com/news/village-voice/the-voice-is-even-more-fucked-up-than-usual-157816.php
South Florida is particularly notable for its large number of transplants from heavily urbanized northern areas like New York, where police departments tend to operate under a "siege", us-vs-them mentality.  Might explain the actions of these cops, to some degree. People love to ridicule liberterianism with its private security companies, but it doesn't look like the public kind is doing a very good job either.  If bribery were legal at least you'd have a good chance of getting the justice you paid for. 
I have a hard time believing this.  I'm not saying this is impossible, it's just that I've never heard of a story like this.
Why is this on request reddit?
Both.  Study math as an undergrad, avoid it as a grad student or profession.  I used to joke with my fellow physics majors that an undergrad physics degree is worth at least 6 figures on Wall Street, but a physics Ph.D is worth $30k at some 2-bit state college.   
Looks like this has been implemented.
this is a good idea. a discussion of how fast you think might be in order, then again it might not. Some tests are a little more accurate than IQ which has a subjective/cultural element.
A few criticisms: [1] It's misrepresentation to describe a *successful* scientist as doing a five year postdoc, a seven year jr. professorship and getting denied tenure.  At least in my field (cognitive psychology) the superstars can get prof positions straight out of the PhD, and most schools have reasonably high rates of granting tenure.  Good but not exceptional candidates can get tenured positions through persistance (it's not easy, but tenure is a substantial reward).  (An aside: you can be fired [with cause] prior to being granted tenure, but it's quite a perk to be guaranteed a *job for life* upon gaining tenure).  I'm sure this varies by discipline,region, and school, but Greenspun's "average trajectory for a *successful* scientist" is a strawman. [2] Many scientists *do* love what they do and the lifestyle associated with academe.  My grad school advisor spent far more time drinking coffee on the quad watching the undergrad girls go by than any banker I know. [3] This neglects the opportunity of scientists to leave the ivory tower and head to industry.  Many of my friends are now consultants, market researchers, data analysts, and user research leads.  These folks make very reasonable money (better than folks with BAs in the same discipline).  Advanced training in the sciences gives one skills that no undergrad major will offer (both technical skills and important experience in public speaking, writing, and leadership/mentorship). There have been several posts about the silliness of going through grad school and the poor economic prospects of PhD grads.  There are risks involved, and there are *certainly* more lucrative ways to spend one's effort.  However, a discipline you love, a carefully chosen program and advisor, and hard work can certainly lead to a enjoyable and successful career in science. (No comment about humanities PhD prospects).
The title is a bit misleading/ambiguous.  This subreddit would be for reddit users to get very quick feedback on their ideas. For example, if someone has two or three ideas for a startup, he/she could post them on ideas.reddit.com to see which ones attract attention and the sorts of discussions that ensue on them.
The founder of Ikea drives a '93 Volvo. lol
If you noticed, the adds are in the comments on the main reddit site and the soon to be front page for many people my.reddit.com too. But make no mistake, I don't at all request that they stop advertising, just maybe they could blend it in a little? In an all text site like this, I'd think that someone would be *more* likely to click links that looked like they belong.
That statement is demonstrably incorrect.  A huge hunk of the MGM libraries (I think everything they ever did before 1950-an absurd number of films)  was sold at one point by Ted Turner.  Further, studios themselves get bought and sold with and without their film libraries from time to time.  In 1997, Kirk Kerkorian paid about $600M for about 2000 films.  That implies a value of about $300K/film, and further implies that Intel could pick up something like 10K films for less than a fab.
I hate to tell you this but curling has been around long before bowling, billiards, and hockey.  It was invented in Scotland somwhere around 400-500 years ago.  Obviously it is done a little differently than it was back then but there are few sports that can claim a history like curling does.  Check out this http://icing.org/game/history/historya.htm if you are interested in the history.  And as others have said, curling and drinking go hand in hand, so drink up and get out on that ice!
What a bunch of assholes.
check out [the manual](http://ed-thelen.org/comp-hist/lgp-30-man.html) for the LGP-30 from 1957. It disspates 5000BTUs/hr (spec's at bottom of page). That's about 1500W/hr - no need for radiators in the computer room I guess!
IMHO it reads like a press hit. I mean, if the quotes from the author really came from the author.
Uhoh, did you notice that your comment is invisible to anyone but you? Don't worry, its just part of the new anti-spam security around here. To fix it you'll just need to press the `reply` button and enter your phone number. --reddit admins *wait you're a girl right? :O*
Oh, my mistake. I forgot about the new programming subreddit that owns half the articles on the main page.
I was thinking the same thing except I limited it to titles with the "self" URL:  http://features.reddit.com/info?id=2gvk
It didn't say 100% of the effect of alcohol is placebo, just some ("a great deal").
Too true. One of the best programmers I've worked with had a Ph.D in physics.
Dupes are valid when the title in the first place was unappealing: "A Real Programmer He Was" is much less attention grabbing than "The story of Mel, a real programmer".
so that's what they do with their time..
Usually when I'm on LSD I just watch cartoons and cower at the creators collective genious...
I find this VERY surprising. Intel used to be very careful about "uncompetitive" behavior because they didn't want DOJ attention. I guess Microsoft's experience with Lady Justice may have emboldened them...
Guess we have to learn some new tricks....
All the more reason to be a professional rather than a professor
on ads. you might try the link-units on google. seems to work well and not very intrusive
I'm not giving you my email for the results.  I get enough spam.
The comparison with teachers is laughable. My wife (a very smart person) has been teaching for 10 years. In that time her salary has jumped 15k. She's now 36 and at the end off her payscale. She cannot move up or over any further regardless of how much more experience of schooling she acquires (unless she wants to go into administration). So she is left with union negotiated pay increases that will amount to parity with inflation or a little above. In the next 8 years I doubt that those will bring her current salary (52k) up to 90k.  There's no doubt that scientists are poorly paid when compared against lawyers and business professionals. However, the comparison to teachers misses the point entirely. Both professions though vital to society are relegated to low pay because they aren't seen as vital. Neither is consumption driven so in a consumer-centric economy these professions aren't valued. 
The Bible and Homosexuality!
The team at Nakatomi have developed a product they claim will change the way we think about social aggregation. Currently in a private alpha, this product is expected to launch early next month, those who register early will get free accounts, and included in the beta tests.
Expirement: Give some Jr. highers some decaff and tell them it's triple-shot.
I'm curious, were you joking or not?
This article is crap. It doesn't matter what rights are in which ammendment. "Oh noes, they got the 5th Ammendment confused with the first!" Who cares? Being a good citizen means knowing what rights we have generally, not being a constitutional scholar.
Under the language-specific improvements section:  "C and Objective-C The old Bison-based C and Objective-C parser has been replaced by a new, faster hand-written recursive-descent parser." I hope they have a good set of tests for C and Objective C.
We can't trust that the large media companies and networks. It's all propaganda to serve the interests of business, governments and people in power. Who really knows what going on in the world? Who are the good guys and the bad guys?
I agree, it is more than just disk space.  Still seems like a lot of cash for a little hardware to me. I think it will eventually come to commodity pricing (cheap).  Maybe there's an opportunity for a start-up here.  The name of the game will be getting market share early.
Agreed.  Not cool.
how the hell does this work? I've got it installed, but I can't find any instructions and it doesn't create an icon or even show me where it installed to.
Digg and Newsvine make the cut, reddit's not on the radar 
Salman Rushdie tempting fate again... the guy has balls... and an [amazingly good looking wife](http://www.comiccaptions.com/images/Salman%20Rushdie.jpg).
Wow... computer programming is a difficult task that requires a long time and high intelligence to learn. Who knew?
(Micro) Capitalism to the rescue
I figure capitalism is the fastest system to setup.  Don't need to wait for some bureaucracy..  Everyone is working for their own self interest and indirectly helping everyone else out (providing service, goods, jobs etc..). One thing that confuses me, is it a charity or a hyper-venture capital?  It seemed to imply that you would "eventually" get payed back?
It's even funnier if you caught the wordplay, i.e. yuan is the chinese currency :-)
まってました。  Trac使わない理由がなくなったな。。。
Objective-C++?  That really just sounds like a lesson in masochism.  The move from bison was a shock as well.  Having compiled glibc a couple of times before, I'm pretty sure, though, that the GCC guys have a full suite of concept checkers as part of the build process when developing parser changes.
It's a statistic so it must be true!
Like the current option to have links open in a new windows, but in new tabs instead. (via target="_new"?)
I would wager IQ is uncorrelated with salary.  I don't necessarily see a connection with being smart and earning a lots of money.  Figure a person drive and passion is more important.
Nova's [Secret of Photo 51](http://www.pbs.org/wgbh/nova/photo51/about.htm) program about Rosalind Franklin's xray photograph that helped give insight into the structure that Watson and Crick developed.
I guess Y Combinator is a kind of micro capital company too in a way.
Kiva lets you make loans at zero interest. You get your money back once the loan is paid off and you can lend it to someone else if you'd like. Sofar they have a 100% payback rate but there is a chance you might not get all your cash back if someone defaults.
Cops will lie to you for any reason, film at 11.
Stupidest sport ever. Even worse than baseball.
And hide your root password before getting drunk, I've read more than one story of people doing stupid things like deleting partitions while drunk.
This is so fastseduction.com  And yea, I was kinda shocked to figure out that women prefer that kind of treatment, but then I thought. Hey - everybody knows nice guys don't get layed, and jerks do. I can't change women. So why not change myself.
I sure hope not.
Oh wow! It worked...I've become a genius!
Yeah, I agree. We should get rid of javelin, like, who throws sharp spears anymore.  And basketball. I mean, you have to be abnormally tall, and the games are rarely won by statistically significant scores. Five more seconds, the other team would have won. And figure skating. Most of the judges are corrupt crooks. In fact, once you look at the real list of sports that is posted, you kind of wonder what is REALLY a sport. I mean, in the way that actual performance is central and training is significant and the judging process is objective. Those are the sports where the dopers hang out.  Sigh. The thing that REALLY amazes me is that to get a gold medal in hockey you play, what, 10 games? To get a gold medal in bobsledding you slide down a hill 4 times and win by .1 seconds.  Sigh^2.   
If you need money, let us invest in you. ( http://features.reddit.com/info?id=21up )
FYI There is a lot of drink driving going on here in New Zealand. As a result, our ad campaigns change every few weeks and they make that one look dull. :)
And here's the same story, with video. Wow.  http://www.msnbc.msn.com/id/11627394/
Do you ever feel like you are stuck in a reality that is suffocating your very life: that you are trapped and powerless to make the changes that can save you from the place that has captured your dreams and smothered your hopes?
that's not true at all. Research has shown a very definite correlation between earnings potential and IQ...to a point. The whole thing falls apart at IQ 160 and above, but before that the relation is staggeringly proportional. That's the real value of IQ. It doesn't tell us how smart we are...it tells us how much on average a person with a certain mental capability will make in their lifetime...which of course we all know has nothing to do with how smart you are. So there you have it, the true value of IQ as a tool for analyzing the general population. Btw, no quotes...google has plenty on this i'm sure. Having had to have a few such tests myself, I have heard it time and time again when asking different psychologists what IQ is really good for.
I wish I had a $1 for every time someone predicted doom and gloom.  In reality, those with wealth in the US want to keep things just the way they are... with themselves on top.  That means things will stay remarkable like they are today.  Yeah, there will be tweaks here and there, but nothing radical.
Nice self post.  Can you imagine a reddit world where everyone posted their own shit, instead of shit they thought was interesting?  Thanks for contributing. 
Philip's rants on this topic invariably seem to focus on science and engineering careers in academia; in typical Greenspun fashion he then proceeds to draw conclusions about *all* science and engineering careers. It seems to me if you have the brains to make it through a top science/engineering degree program *and* the skill to market yourself to those who need brains, you can make a killing. The paths to big money in the medical and law fields are admittedly more well trodden and clear-cut, however.
I agree, I believe some people just know how to sell a story, while other just stick to the facts.  They should be rewarded regardless of it being a dup.
Seems suspicious.  Wired actually linked to this same story:   http://www.wired.com/news/technology/1,70015-0.html Searching for "hofmann crick lsd" makes it clear there is atleast a good amount of speculation on this claim:   http://www.google.com/search?q=hofmann+crick+lsd
thanks for the history lesson professor, but curling sucks
Here's my take on this: it's like the feather in Dumbo. Remember that? He thought it was the magic reason he was able to fly. The value of this book is it makes men think they know some secret magic super tricks that can hypnotise women into going home with them, so they confidently go after them, striking up conversations and keeping them going. But, as you might guess, the specifics of the tricks don't matter except insofar as they they give the guys confidence. The Schwartz was in you all along!
lame. that requires another google!
Thats the cool thing, Kiva's not really a charity. It's a 0-interest loan, so you'll get your money back eventually. So no loss to you except a little interest, but you're really helping other people out. Plus, the people getting the money are businessment, so you know that your money isn't just going to some wino to help feed his habit, which is the biggest reason I almost never donate to any other charity.
I wish they would let others contribute to Y Combinator as well. I know plenty of people who would be willing to risk a couple grand on a high-risk startup that they pick out themselves.
The typical thing you want to say is, "Hi Mr Knuth. I've TRIED to read ONE of your books..."
Did you even READ the article??  That was exactly his point; that the rich will tire of the increasing complexity of the current income tax system.  They will see the potential for their own personal gain and will begin the motions necessary for that change.
Providing loans is like giving out fishing nets instead of just giving out fish. It's too bad all aid is not given out this way rather then given to dictators that put the money in their Swiss bank accounts.
well, it is not "love", but "love with attachment and all such **extra** crap"
Right here: http://cocksanddolls.blogspot.com/2006/03/letter-to-editor.html A really interesting and thoughtful response to the knee-jerk attitude of the Voice. --- AFC nice guy who just got LJBF'd by the gal he likes
Cool business idea. A pool of donations collected online and distributed to startups in exchange for ownership, and the donors rewarded accordingly.  I think I just re-invented the mutual fund.
Definitely a nice article. Wish I'd had that two years ago. As it happened, I didn't discover the incredible utility of Javascript's OOP until I read up some of the articles on [Douglas Crockford's site](http://javascript.crockford.com/survey.html).
"The patent specifically involves the mechanisms used to embed interactive programs in a Web browser. Eolas successfully sued Microsoft in 2003 alleging IE's plug-in architecture infringed on its patent, and was awarded $521 million in damages, which has ballooned to $560 million due to interest."
I think you're confused. The earliest known examples of a set for bowling are ancient Egyptian and over 5000 years old. The first modern reference to bowling by name was when the king of England banned it in 1343 so that soldiers would get back to archery practice. Table billiards is not quite as old as bowling, but the first descriptions and images of ground billiards appeared 900 years ago, in the 12th century. As for hockey, the earliest reference to the modern name itself was recorded almost 500 years ago. Some of hockey's forms (many not played on ice) can be traced to over 4000 years ago. A common example is that the ancient Greeks played a version of hockey quite avidly in 517BC.  Curling is not so old really. Most major sports are in fact quite a bit older than Curling, with many of the exceptions being American sports.
Exactly. You know, I notice that I've never read any of this so-called questionable content. And why is this? Because I, like all the other at least partially intelligent people, use information evaluating and filtering methods - like reddit and other link sites, or trusted blogs, or certain news sites, whatever - to eliminate bad content. And they really do work very well. Mostly, this article is bullshit scare journalism, part of the same crap he's writing about.
The Life Extension Foundation wrote about this in March 2001, the article can be found here  http://www.lef.org/magazine/mag2001/mar2001_report_vegetables.html A follow up article was written in Sep 2005, and can be found here:  http://search.lef.org/cgi-src-bin/MsmGo.exe?grab_id=0&amp;page_id=1916&amp;query=organic&amp;hiword=ORGAN%20ORGANICALLY%20ORGANS%20organic%20 These articles are excellent and thorough, providing references for further reading. If you have time for one, start with the newer (2005) article. In short,   1) Organic food may have significantly more antioxidants and other nutrients than "commodity" food which is bred to look good on the shelves. 2) satisfy your RDA's from food. The RDA's are crap, but you'de be surpised how hard this is if you're eating an appropriate low-calorie diet. Your genetics, age, level of activity, and sex may determine how much extra nutrients you need. 3) take a good multivitamin as an insurance policy. Writing how to do this is beyond the scope of what I can write here. Make it your responsability to do your homework. The LEF website is a good start. You may try some of Dr Colgan's and Dr Weil's literature. An excellent all-out framework on calories / nutrition can be found in the late Dr Walford's book "Beyond the 120 year diet". His daughter wrote an easier-to-read version. You don't have to follow the program to the extreme to learn a lot of practical stuff. 4) don't expect the government to look out for your interests in this area Also: If you live in Europe, your availability to vitamins may be severely restricted. Thank your government, the WTO, Codex Alimentarious Commission, and EU  for looking out for your best interests and restricting your freedom.   If you live in the US, fight for your freedom to keep taking vitamins, as forces attempt to erode this freedom continuously. Many may think that Monsanto will save the day with some kind of engineered food that has all the goodies - call me old fashioned, but I'd rather just have the food that mother nature and humans have evolved to use over the millenia.  
Displaying the number of points for links encourages "group think" and distracts from the titles. If nothing else please make the display of points optional because I don't want to see them if I don't have to.
Stupid lack of Wayback machine indexing: try this link:  http://72.14.207.104/search?sourceid=navclient-ff&amp;ie=UTF-8&amp;q=cache:http://www.geocities.com/dprk02/day1.htm
Don't worry. Xcode (the development environment that most people are using these days) makes it pretty easy to write code once and compile for both platforms. Most new software will naturally be buildable for both platforms without any extra work. Only very specialized highly processor optimized algorithms may need to be written to specific processors, but occurrances of this will probably be few and far-between.
Wow - that looks amazing! Life, Sim City, Asteroids, Missle Defense, Star Craft, Red Alert, Civilization, Risk, Spaceward Ho, etc... all rolled into one.
It certainly is an intriguing video. I'm curious to know how much common there is between the phases, though. Like, is going to be a gradual, evolutionary thing, or will there be clearly split "End of Act I, Beginning of Act II" with dramatically altered gameplay style? My worry is just that with this much awesome, they may end up spreading it kind of thin. Anyone else remember some other recent overambitious games? Black &amp; White? Fable?
&gt;The paths to big money in the medical and law fields are admittedly more well trodden and clear-cut, however.  &gt;The paths to big money in the medical and law fields are admittedly more well trodden and clear-cut, however. True, but we must Never Forget how much it truly sucks to be a lawyer.  (Or at least most lawyers.)  Do you hate doing your taxes?  Imagine that x10 all day every day.  They have the highest dissatisfaction for a reason!
You mean, say, the constitutionally protected right to own pets? The point is, most Americans DON'T have a vervy good grasp on what their rights are, not just that they don't know where they come from.
I agree with you on that.  The only "sports" which should be in the Olypmics are those whose winners can be determined with either a stopwatch or a tape measure. Curling is still very interesting to me as a sport in general... just not an Olympic sport.
Привет пользователям ru.reddit.com! В настоящий момент на сайте ru.reddit.com есть 7 "писателей" (т.е. людей, "поставляющих" ссылки) и примерно 35 ссылок. ИМХО, полезность ресурса существенно возрастает при увеличении количества пользователей и количества поступаемой информации (сравните хотя бы с reddit.com, имеющим около 20,000 пользователей).  Предлагаю поставить цель: добиться увеличения устойчивой аудитории (= "писателей") ru.reddit.com до 100 человек к концу марта - есть гипотеза, что 100 - это минимальная критическая масса, при которой дальнейшее развитие ресурса пойдёт само собой (да и число круглое). Предлагаю использовать этот пост для обмена идеями об увеличении аудитории, и обсуждения возможных путей развития этого ресурса.
Excellent POV. "Although internet service providers sell their internet connections as unlimited usage, if people actually take them up on the offer then they can't actually cope with demand" 
Один из вариантов увеличения количества пользователей: реклама своим знакомым (ЖЖ, персональная почта, устные рекомендации и т.д.)
Ahh, rampant unfounded speculation. Considering a few major vendors haven't ported their stuff to Intel yet, I think sounding the alarm is a little premature. Even if Apple switches entirely to Intel, your current PPC machine will likely be well out of date by then.
Bookmarked. Excellent article.   
Zero-interest loans *are* charity. /me mumbles something about economic educations these days...
Iraq was over WMD not 911. Specifically Sadam kicking out UN Weapons Inspectors.
can't you measure with a tape which stone is closer to the bulls-eye?
This is awesome! I wish someone would post a video.
Yup, Black and White was what popped into my head while I was watching this.  Free form creativity in a game is sincerely great, but I believe the left brainers form the backbone of the video game market. We need some structure, rationality, clear bounds to push against and antagonize to achieve our temporal satisfaction. Not that this isn't possible with a game s far reaching as the one Wright demonstrted (woah, my "A" key is F#$@ed from my WoW days), but so far I have been disappointed with games that push the traditional outlines to the extreme. I guess I'm saying that I agree with you Mr. Purvis. But who knows, maybe Wright will be the one that nails it.
Uh, that's plain wrong, it's from 2006-03-02.  Sorry about that.
I wonder if they have [complaint forms](http://cbs4.com/topstories/local_story_033170755.html).
yupp there are surely more than 3904242 web frameworks out there in ruby,python etc.  There is also CakePhp for Php4, but Symfony has some great stuff to offer to.The video tutorials and demos are good like askeet.  The developers seem to have a good vision too plus its got some 5-star documentation already!
The fact that he was driving a sheriff's department car with emergency lights and he pulled over a city bus would be my first clue. The whole thing could be made up, of course, but if the story is true, it sounds like it was a real cop.
your -&gt; you're
I'm as much impressed by the quick construction as by the simple design.
Step 1:  Find out what good is a [classmethod](http://programming.reddit.com/info?id=2mcl).   Oh, I think I [get it](http://johnmudd.infogami.com/blog/classmethod) now. 
I agree absolutely. It's a very impressive tech demo (and all games should have editors that nice), but will it actually be any fun?
Why oh why you have to torture us finns by showing that shot
Interesting. So is Reddit encouraging group intelligence, or herd stupidity? Maybe there's a bit of both. On the New page, if the first few readers of a submission dislike it, I get the impression that their votes make it disappear off everybody else's radar, much like the empty restaurant in the article. (Or maybe I've just got sour grapes.)
That's true. On the other hand, British teeth haven't bombed Iraq lately.
I know it by heart: here it is:
Мне вот интересно - кто всё минусы ставит за мои новости?  Понятно, что есть несколько спорные среди них, но когда даже за обычную новость о том, что грузины хотят ущерб с России потребовать, загоняют в минусы...  Просто желания постить это далеко не прибавляет
Ещё вопрос - почему ссылка на картинке с русским реддитом идёт на реддит.ком а не на ру.реддит.ком - кто-нибудь в курсе? Раньше было всё нормально, а сейчас неудобно очень
1) На большом reddit велась некоторое время назад дискуссия о несовершенстве системы плюс/минус. Грубо говоря, есть не одно направление, которые люди оценивают, а два: а) Качество самого текста (низкое / высокое)  б) Интересность данного текста для данного оценивающего (интересно / не интересно) и люди часто смешивают одно с другим. Кроме того, отчасти эффект низкой оценки может объясняться нерпрезентативностью выбранной группы - оценку производит всего 5 человек. Это гораздо менее точно отражает качество / интересность, чем мнение 100 человек или 1000. Так что предложение - просто продолжать, паралелльно привлекая новых пользователей на сайт.
Тут я тоже знаю ответ - зайдите на features.reddit.com; люди давно просили сделать такую функциональность для всех subreddits - и я тоже считаю её удобной. Потому что для ru.reddit уже работаю кнопки hot, new и т.д.
Basically, "IDEs need to be better before the man on the street will bother writing programs". &lt;gasp&gt; Unfortunately he seems to think the way forward is a system in which "there are fewer chances for error because of the constrained input choices". So constrained input choices are good? Basically he wants an IDE that has a button for each program you can make. Clicking a button can be programming, right? :)
Забавно, что это совпадает с тем, что по этому вопросу ан Западе сейчас происходит (линки на reddit.com проходили)
ок, ждём-с :)
試してみたいと思っていたので…
Nope, I've seen that too. And then later the same article (with slightly different URL) do well.... I think there's a larger danger from group-think today than from ignoring "the wisdom of crowds". (The "stupidity of mobs?")
Maybe. The variance in markup could make this really difficult or prone to being labour intensive. The only way I see how this could be done easily without too much processing would be a sloppy hash for the actual text of the files and then collision checking. By "sloppy hash" I mean a hashing function that allows for a lot of collisions for similar data. This is used in ESR's [comparator](http://www.catb.org/~esr/comparator/). Come to think of it, maybe running comparator on a tag-stripped version of the file would be the solution.
Yes, and that one shot pretty much decided the fate of the gold medal. I watched the match live, and had to marvel the shot, even when it meant the we (the Finnish team) would lose the game... Oh the bitterness.   
A little slow to start, but fun, fun, fun after you "get it"
ESR has written a program called [comparator](http://www.catb.org/esr/comparator/). It uses a sloppy hash to detect similar lines in source code and flags them so you can refactor copy&amp;paste code. It also lets you use it to flag copywritten code (i.e. if it's copy&amp;pasted from copywritten sections of code, then there you go). I think this can be used to easily detect a large factor of dupes. When a dupe is found, the link can have a flag/icon/"see also" link. Or you can hard and fast block the dupe from being reported. Thoughts? Concerns?
It's especially unhelpful when, as in this case, the bigger problem (IMHO of course) seems to have been the use of EJBs rather than Design Patterns per se.
Well CMU Lisp did only implement 4 of 12 programs. Admittedly some trivial programs (i.e. Hello World) are also there.
Google Mapsよりもユーザ志向な地図情報サービス。分かりやすくて○。
この手のネーミングにはいつも迷うなぁ。
This seemed a bit overly negative, but with a kernel of truth. It does ignore the yet another factor, that in general women might just night like that kind of work. As to the dismal prospects of grads, I think Philip is somewhat affected by his own experience. It is definitely possible to make the jump from academia to industry, and thereby to land semi-stable and okay paying jobs. I left Computer Science after a Master's degree, and am pretty happy (and haven't had trouble finding a job). I find his viewpoint a bit full of doom and gloom. I do agree that many women might be smarter about planning for the future, and less likely to go into weird directions. This fits with the biologically observed trait that males of a species tend to have a wider spread (i.e. larger standard deviation) in almost all traits. Mixing up cause and effect to yield a pithy aphorism: We're expendable, so it's worth experimenting in the hope of winning big.
これは興味深い。。
bighead I'm inclined to agree with you.  The Sims 2 sounded awfully interesting and even exciting to me, and it held my attention for about 4 hours. Then again, if this does as well as The Sims, it will be a smashing success.
3554 Amun is a small metalic asteroid that crosses Earth's pass (not on collission course) and contains over 20 trillion US dollars worth of precious metal.
No slug bug back!
you mean a vulnerability aside from google indexing and archiving your email?
Awesome stuff; I've had the sheer privelage of a sneak peak at the work in progress, and I must say its unassailably accomplished.
-1 потому что, ну и что?
So they're going with an all ASCII-art UI for Firefox 2 now?
Добавил новость на news2.ru - клон digg.com  Посмотрим как там отнесутся :)
The inspectors were withdrawn, not kicked out.  And today, over 80% of the soldiers in Iraq think that they are there to retaliate for 9/11. To quote the blog:  http://www.underthesamesun.org/content/2004/07/the_inspectors.html "This lie has been refuted so many times that it gets tiresome to constantly correct it. I suppose that's the difficulty of correcting problems that are caused by structural factors; the lies naturally propagate while efforts to correct them are time-consuming and difficult. Over time, the liars overwhelm the truth-tellers. And the biggest lies are the big picture lies, which are much harder to correct than these smaller, factual lies. A big lie takes a sentence; a proper refutation might need take a book."
Yeah, definitely too early to be hailing it as the "best video game ever".
subsumes http://features.reddit.com/info?id=270k I suppose in the spirit of making all pages the same you could add summary information to any reddit submission: "n comments since you last visited" These would then automatically show up on the saved page.
Oh, I think I [get it](http://johnmudd.infogami.com/blog/classmethod) now.
Works great for a video game, but its probably not the best mindset to go by. I mean...if the original Mac team really did go out of their way to mess everything up and then tried to fix it later, Apple wouldn't be in business. Try it with a woman, I guarantee it won't work.
I would even go so far to say that a lack of personal ethics and disregard of the emotions and needs of other people is necessary to become one of those highly paid corporate CEOs.
No video, but the original site goes into great detail about the construction: http://www.freewebs.com/jet_beetle/ There's also a moped with twin jet engines ;-)
But science and teaching have the additional advantage that you won't be the first to get shot in the next revolution. Lawyers are probably among the top 3 with the CEOs and the politicians.
So why is there no article attacking the ISPs for entering fraudulent contracts they can't fulfil? Attacking everything Internet Users do is popular in the old media, attacking companies is not.
If any of you would like to read someting interesting related to this topic go and get a copy of Fooled by Randomness : The Hidden Role of Chance in Life and in the Markets by Nassim Nicholas Taleb The bottom line is that we are not used to think statistically nor good at taking good population samples. Have Fun!
This article is just more of that sensationalistic bull shit that other countries like to publish to perpetuate the myth that all americans are fat ignorant slobs.
If that's the case then you'd probably want to see Reddit allow resubmission of the same URL; why make someone find a second URL for something in order to sell it better?
Yeah, you would think smart people on reddit would know about opportunity costs.
"In fact, as much as I wish it were, breaking your penis isn’t rare. Guys do it when they get all pile drivery and they miss the bull's-eye, or when she’s riding Bronco Billy and slips off the saddle. Bend a penis past the breaking point and you can snap the inner chambers, releasing blood into surrounding areas."  Good to know...
Is this still scheduled for [fall 2006](http://www.cnn.com/2005/TECH/fun.games/05/20/e3.games/index.html)?
Yes, they want to take some market share from lynx.
That's why I only watch poker now.
I voted for this, but the images disturbed me a bit. I should say that I am a Liberal, and I have no problem with women in the military. Still, seeing women with guns conflicts with my mental archetypes of women as creators of life. I'm not trying to start a flame-war. Just sayin'.
better google than microsoft or yahoo
Yeah, who ever heard of scientists, academics and intellectuals being eliminated during a revolution? Oh, wait...
Ещё забавнее кто мои сообщения тут минусует? :)  У кого-то какая-то нездоровая неудовлетворённость...
This, IMHO, is ridiculous. All it does is creat suspicion for people who dont want to get their DNA tested, which is the point. They dont care about the people who voluntarily give their DNA, but anyone who refuses they investigate. This is a serious concern for anyone who doesnt want to get their DNA tested in the first place, and no matter where its dont, in this case voluntarily, or court ordered to check in a murder investigation because you initially refused, you DNA is then on record for life. Longer than life actually, those Bits will outlive you.  In any case there are plenty of people out there who want their DNA off the record, if only for privacy reasons. There was a similar case here, in the states, Truro, Mass. They wanted to test everyone in the town, again on a voluntary basis. Anyone who refused they investigated, and never caught the killer. All that happen is that ACLU came out here, to this little rural town with less than 1000 year time residents, and made a big fuss. Also, it didnt add up since the murder had happened in the summertime, when the towns population surges from 10k - 15k. Its all pointless, and an apparent abuse of technology.
There's no way this will do as well as The Sims, no matter how cool or how good it is.  I suspect that a big selling point for The Sims was the perceived "normality" of it.  People who would never have usually played a computer game were happy to because it didn't feel too weird to them.  The game, however real, is probably still to abstract for the "mainstream", Sims-playing gamer. On the other hand though, even if it only does a quarter as well as The Sims, it'll still be a smashing success...
I believe that the context of this discussion is academia, since the issue originally centered around why there aren't more female professors. For my part, I meet a lot of women getting Biology PhDs and not nearly as many men. And they're all interested in working in industry.
As an eye accident victim, I look at this research with a shred of hope. Maybe some day I can get mack some of the vision in my right eye ;)
Wasn't there this same idea on the dreamcast?
That way 3 people voting something down as soon as it is submitted would not immediately lessen the likelyhood of 6 other people still having the item on their new page for their upmodding.
From [a hot sub](http://waderoush.typepad.com/twr/2005/03/james_surowieck.html): &gt;Second, keep yourself exposed to as much information as possible. Injecting some level of randomnesss into the system is a good thing.
The scooter at the bottom is good too.
as in, the parts of the story concerned with the other military forces of the world. i spotted soldiers from the Russian Federation, Norway, Germany, and Sweden, and that's just the countries i could identify with any certainty; there were several others i couldn't. (nice AK's, though. i liked the FAL clone, too; wonder which country that was.)
Оба твоих комментария проминусовал я - так как они не соответствует заявленной теме обсуждения; хочется, чтобы наверх попали комментарии про распространение информации о ru.reddit, а не офф-топик :). ИМХО, не стоит так сильно обращать внимание на рейтинг - это условность, и не в нём дело
there's nothing fraudulent about it.  generally (although i'm sure exceptions occur) these things get stated in at least the T&amp;C's and usually there is some plain english explanation of this when you buy. The argument of 'what if everyone were to suddenly decide to download at the full rate' is a weak one - virtually every company with a large customer base will be incapable of fulfilling their contracts if everyone demands the same thing at the same time.  On the web we have slashdoting, in finance we have bank-runs in telecoms we have the new years eve problem, the same things happen with air miles, insurance companies, tech support, the list goes on and on. You *could* demand that when you phone tech support there is guaranteed to be a person there to receive your call, but the only way for the company to achieve this is to employ one tech support person for every product sold, and I don't think you would be happy to pay $30,000 for the service. In the end it is a rather pointless exercise attacking either ISP's or internet users.  It is just an issue of supply and demand and the most efficient way of distributing finite resources.  If an ISP comes up with a way of providing a better service for less money (and profits accordingly), then good for them.  If they fail to do this, I'll take my money elsewhere.
I knew it!  The universe hates us.  We're screwed.
the "wisdom of the crowds" apparently only works when there is almost no influencing or getting information from the same source within the crowd. Everything called mainstream culture today is clearly the opposite and one could argue most website communities have that problem as well.
対象読者層によってはこういうGetting Started的な内容をトップページに持ってきてくれると、手っ取り早かったりする
"Question: Why take diet pills, when you can enjoy AIDS?" I just thought it was funny last night at 3 am because I was sleepy. Turns out... nope... still hysterical in the morning.
Actually, the best solution is to run a bayesian filter against the tag stripped version. Another good solution is to make a word rarity score and only pull the rarest words in the tag stripped version.
Will Wright is what Peter Molyneux only dreams he could be.  Fable was a horrible game.  Spores looks fantastic.
Letter from the editor:  http://villagevoice.com/news/0610,news,72372,2.html
Bah.  This article will be off the front page the end of the day.  Trust me.
Free music \o/  \o,  ,o/
Getting Real, a book:  or, you're not Getting a Real book. :)
Ты чего это же не рейтинг, это карма :))
How would a byesian filter figure it out? I don't think it can do what we want. I don't think the rarity score would work either as it would be focused on jargon of a particular topic, I imagine. It might flag similar articles when it should be only flagging dupes and ~98% dupes. And linkjacks.
[This comment page](http://programming.reddit.com/info?id=2knm) has more discussion on it.
Can someone explain what the voiceover means when he said "all this is generated procedurally"? Does he mean procedural programming or simply outcome of player's accumulated choices so far? 
dupe http://reddit.com/info?id=1y1j  admittedly first site is down
Ok, so this guy is an academic at MIT... does he expect us to just believe the figures that he spouts off without some sort of references?  Dont be fooled by this!  An unreferenced statistic is a lie.  (Lots of referenced ones are too, but we at least get the chance to investigate those).  This is just a rant.  Treat it like any other blog rant.  His credentials just mean he should know better.  I'm not sure about you, but the smartest guy who sat next to me in undergrad is an assistant prof right now (i'm 28)
A group of 12 writers have put their names to a statement in French weekly newspaper Charlie Hebdo warning against Islamic "totalitarianism". Here is the text in full: After having overcome fascism, Nazism, and Stalinism, the world now faces a new global totalitarian threat: Islamism.
you know, REAL scientists have been looking into this for years, will do it better and more completely than JCRAIGVENTER. where is celera's human genome project now? they published one paper and one draft of the genome, wouldn't tell anyone how they did it (the paper shouldn't have been published), and that was it. nothing else ever. the public human genome project went on to publish something like 25 more drafts of the human genome getting it better and better.  yet JCRAIGVENTER is still pretending he did it and shit. and now he is simply ripping off real scientists ideas, etc, probably with little credit, trying to say he is the first person to think of these novel ideas. fuck him.  he can take his yacht, his money, and his fucking french poodles and stick it all up his ass.
Overview of ESL podcasts for improving your English level (listening comprehension). All of these resources are specialized ESL (English as a Second Language) podcasts hosted by professional English-teachers and native speakers.
If I click on a logo that says "esperanto reddit", it really should not take me to the reddit.com main page.  I clicked on it to take me to the esperanto.reddit.com main page. The current behavior makes perfect sense for same-language subreddits, like programming.reddit.com and nsfw.reddit.com, but make little to no sense for language based subreddits.
Isn't their 15 minutes of fame up yet?
Let me revise my stance... ... I actually don't like any of the logos going back to http://reddit.com/ Clicking and "features reddit" I want to go to features.reddit.com.  Clicking on the reddit logo in my.reddit.com, I want to go to my.reddit.com.  The current functionality is very annoying to me.
That's just silly. First, this guy makes a confusion between the cost of a line of code in his visual basic dirty hacks vs. a line of code in such a complex system as a plane, on which hundreds of lives depend on a daily basis. Every single LoC in a plane has to be certified to an amazing level; the same for hardware, which must be extremely fault tolerant. How to make *sure* these hacks won't block the system in a critical time, and cause a crash? No airline would accept to run such a risk, and rightly so. Second, it's just useless. There will be no more use of a plane as a missile, the whole concept is spoiled. All can be done now is destroy it in flight, but no crew and no passengers will ever let terrorrists pilot a plane anymore, should it take all their lives.
I think the "wisdom of the crowds" only applies well to topics that have a high barrier to entry: programming, math research, astro science, etc. Highly thought out material will be recognized even by the newcomers. Then again, these groups have scared away most of the crowd. Topics that are the opposite of this would be: politics, pop culture stuff, music. Everyone's a pro on these and everyone's just pulling it out of their ass. Discussions or articles on these have a nice entertainment value at times but they're worthless for someone with a mind. Reddit, please avoid or quarentene such topics or we'll be taken hostage by "stupidity of the mobs".
Yah, they sound good for the most part. But I wonder if you can turn some of them off. For example they're talking about moving the stop/refresh button, and the go button, to be inside of the address bar, rather than buttons to the left and right. (They also mentioned the RSS button but that's already in the address bar so I'm not sure what they're talking about.)  Anyways, I hate the stop, refresh and go buttons. I have them all disabled in my firefox. I wonder if I'll be able to turn them off when they're inside the address bar? I know I can't turn off the existing RSS button, which is fine since I use that. But I use keyboard shortcuts for stop/refresh/go (escape/f5/enter). I hope these address bar additions are not forced. They just make for a more cluttered appearance in my opinion.
Right now, if one "hides" a story say, in the main reddit page, it will still show up in my.reddit.com.  I think hide should hide across all reddits used with the same username
I would like to have a "clear" button to the left of the address field for us linux users like konqueror does.
ah, I see that you've fallen for the old misspelling pickup. Well now that I've broken the ice how about you suprise your roommate and not come home tonight?;) *(only if your a sexy seniorita) Is it just me or are all women on the net really 40yo bald guys?*
I got the book, and a lot of the ideas in it seem like they would help a lot.  Worth the $20... sure why not.
It's the outcome of the player's accumulated choices, but it's more than that. The game uses a set of simple rules to determine behavior (such as for deciding what it means when you add an arm to a specific skeleton) rather than coding separate behaviors for each possible case. I think this is also what means when he says the behavior is emergent from the player's choices in various editors. The advantage is that you can handle a lot more choices if you don't have to code up each of them separately, and also that this way the consequences of your choices can actually be surprising.
Не всё так плохо: http://www.gazeta.ru/2006/03/02/oa_190705.shtml
He seems to mean that nothing is hard-coded, but is rather generated on the fly based on a set of rules.
I made a slight change that I hope someone other than myself enjoys: click on the mascot to go back to the current subreddit, click on the words "reddit" to go back to reddit.com itself.
and how much is THAT going to cost?  o rly?  let's have a panel discussion, with refreshments, instead
Kind of social network thing mashed with file sharing thing.  Got a player as well.
Omniweb's no-status-bar operation has always struck me as obviously the best. Since no one has copied them, I'm curious if maybe I'm missing something. Instead of the URL of a link displaying in the status bar, it displays in the URL bar. If you move your mouse off the link w/o clicking, the URL bar returns to its previous state. No functionality is lost by removing the status bar &amp; everything makes sense. Why doesn't everyone copy that?
test
Just mail a check to this guy (from whois): Registrant:  nakamura, ken  4257 ne going  portland, OR 97218  US    Domain Name: GIVEUSALLYOURMONEY.COM    Administrative Contact, Technical Contact:  nakamura, ken\t\tken@smackamerica.org  4257 ne going  portland, OR 97218  US  5032814541 fax: 999-999-9999
drhdh
Nope. Apparently as soon as you create a few useful applications, you can begin pontificating about whatever you want and apparently, people will actually start listening. You can even charge people money for the gift of having you preach obvious ideas at them. It's not that I disagree with these guys, but I find their presumptuousness extremely irritating. It makes me want to not use any of their software, ever. At the very least, they could have chosen to voice their opinions in a way that was less preachy and condescending. It's kind of like how I feel whenever I see a Quentin Tarantino interview - I feel so supremely annoyed that I'm tempted to never see one of his movies again. I think everyone is a lot better off when creative people do less talking and theorizing and more creating.
There's different levels of that, though. Completely generated terrain is one thing, Diablo2-style puzzle piece assembly is another.
Are teachers and scientists paid little because they aren't seen as vital, or because there is a greater supply of people who really want to be scientists and teachers than there is a demand, even if the demand is significant? It's an honest question, I don't know the answer. What I've read is that there are many more PhDs graduating than there are positions at universities, or research positions at the relatively small number of big corporations that have dedicated long term research divisions. Government and big business seem to be the only groups with pockets deep enough to pay for new science. As for teachers, what I've observed is education is a popular field, and maybe it's a case of too many people thinking "well, I'm not sure what I want to do, but I've been influenced by some really good teachers, and teaching is an important job where I think I could have a positive impact," or "well now I've got an English degree, what are my options?" and it's another case of too many people chasing too few jobs. Compare with medicine, which also seems to be a popular field, but where demand for more doctors and nurses is growing and will continue to grow as the population ages. So there's an alternative explanation to "society doesn't see it as vital" (are sports stars considered vital?), but I have no hard facts to back me up either, so I could be full of shit.
Where do you suggest that Abe Vigoda's status should go?
I know it's not intuitive exactly, but it would indeed work. I've been developing a bayesian-based keyword discovery text processing tool for auto-tagging of documents for a file indexing system. Certain words have a different frequency in the english language. For example, you can safely pull out every 'a', 'the' and 'of' from a document before comparing two.  Instead of giving a score, like a spam filter, you get a result of keywords that together make the story unique. Names, for example are a good unique item. The dictionary system preassigns a uniqueness instead of learning like the bayesian filter. The results are similar.   If you'd like some serious discussion of methodologies I can offer some insights. I've been working on this and its applications to reddit for awhile, especially since it has a great deal of significance to my own startup as well (though not in the same area...my startup is making a distributed file system with intelligent user agents). My email is brendan.kohler@gatech.edu if you want to contact me :)
Мне кажется, это идиотизм. Не думал, что встречаются такие клоуны в сети. Вы думаете, что с подобным отношением к людям, которые постят новости, вы добьетесь большой популярности? Очень сомневаюсь!
Interesting philosophy... I still think chicks inexplicably like jerks more than nice guys, but being a confident nice guy over a nervous one is probably a big plus. According to the Voice, the "Game" is about step-by-step procedures for getting laid. An interesting counterpoint to that is the perspective provided in the film *Hitch*... which is less about being a jerk and more about being set up with the right scenarios (and then being suave enough to handle them).
I appreciate it.  Sort of what I was looking for. Take a look though: http://hu.reddit.com/ Which would you expect to take you to hu.reddit.com?  The generic reddit alien or the "magyar reddit" text? Having said that, I think switching it around (clicking alien takes you to reddit.com, clicking on text takes you to current subreddit would be worse... because by habit I click on the alien guy. **May I recommend** introducing a "reddit.com" button to the right of "stats"?  And having the whole reddit logo go to the main page of the current section?
Pwned! :-D Seriously, Knuth is right. "I've read pieces of all your books" would be far more accurate for just about everyone out there who's attempted Knuth at all.
To be clear, voting should be possible.  But the scores should not be displayed (or should be falsely displayed as 1) for the duration of the incubation period.
Because you wouldn't want to miss any fascinating Lithuanian or Japanese posts??
This kind of functionality is trivial to provide with an extension. It's silly to clutter up the main codebase with something like this.
Turn off your status bar, then; the hoverlink-in-title functionality would be trivial to provide through an extension. Edit: I think a more significant FF2 update would be to make extension installation more friendly. Remove the need to restart, or make the restart transparent by saving the session.
Robert Novak is a highly partisan hack, and moreover was instrumental in the outing of a CIA agent for political gain.  I am unsure why we should be taking anything he says with any degree of respect whatsoever. That said, since you have linked to the article, I will comment on it specifically: His thesis is that the Clintons are in disagreement over this, because Mr. Clinton suggested to Dubai Ports World a strategy for defending the deal, while Senator Clinton opposes the deal.  However: * Who cares if the Clintons are in disagreement with each other? Why is that in any way important? The whole article reads as if his main point is "ooh ooh ooh, the Clintons are not a monolithic entity, therefore George W. Bush is the bestest ever!". * Furthermore, they're *not* in fundamental disagreement with each other.  Senator Clinton's "opposition" basically boils down to "Congress should review for 45 days, as is mandated by law, and the President acted injudiciuosly by attempting to get it through without Congess doing so."  Meanwhile, Mr. Clinton's "support" basically boils down to telling Dubai Ports World that they should agree to the legally mandated 45 day review.  These two opinions are easily in agreement, yet Novak simplistically looks at everything in black and white, "support" and "oppose", in an effort to gain political backing through oversimplification of the issue.   
A lot of requests that are asking for changes to affect "all reddits" are probably more sensible when thinking of "all reddits in the same language". I could conceivably want to hide an article in reddit.com that I want to see in eo.reddit.com.  (e.g.: something that is good content but stupidly cross-posted)
&gt;    &lt;!--&lt;tr valign="middle"&gt;    &lt;td colspan="2" align="right"&gt;   &lt;font face="Courier New, Courier" size="-2"&gt;     &lt;i&gt;read about our &lt;a href="security.html"&gt;security policy&lt;/a&gt;&lt;/i&gt;&lt;br&gt;     click &lt;a href="https://www.giveusallyourmoney.com"&gt;here&lt;/a&gt; for secure site   &lt;/font&gt;    &lt;/td&gt;  &lt;/tr&gt;--&gt; *Hehe*
Holy cow.  ASCII being used to describe this kind of stuff... How seriously can this be taken?
cool that they had the audio. he may be mostly right in what he says, but he comes across as the sterotypical paranoid liberal and he should have known better than to present the information with such a tone. there are more tactful ways to get your point across that let people come to the conclusions you want on their own without getting you fired. his kind of dialogue is more suited for talk radio than a classroom.
I think your special comment is, in essence, the embodiment of the very thing which you asked for! ;-) Albeit, unlike what you asked for, it is not visible prior to clicking on the title. Optional displaying of a description could be easily added without adding clutter by some simple javascript/dom trickery to show it on request but not otherwise.  (And since the functionality is not absolutely crucial, there is no great problem even for those that have javascript disabled.)
The trick is though, most people venture into mutual funds with idea that they will get sustained growth.  Or at least this is the feeling I get.  This hyper-venture capital, your risking your money for no growth and potential loss, in hopes you can help another society get on its feet through your "donated" money.  It is a kinda of mini-venture capitalism that features the supply side of the equation (not i need clothes and food), more I need a way to make money and hire others to make me more money.
And which field is he (assuming "he" since you said guy) a professor in?  Probably not a lab science?
Right, trivial, but no one has decided to do it. Am I the only person that would prefer this behavior? Edit: I completely agree.
Microsoft Virtual Earth and Yahoo Traffic
JT LeRoy was the cross-dressing male prostitute who wrote hit books based on his life. But the writer was in fact a 40 year old woman, with her partner's siter playing LeRoy with sunglasses and a bad wig. Now the Weinsteins are producing a piopic on the non-existent author.
[New York] as yet to publish the rules governing how the database should be compiled. Nor has it begun seeking contractors to create the list, or established the technical requirements for the list.
It would be great sort by number of up votes or by date after running a search.  I highly support this feature request.
I doubt very many have even done that -- look at the link from the article.  If Jobs claimed to have gotten through TAOCP, the TeXbook, and the Metafont book, I might believe it, but he did NOT read or even purchase everything on that list.
On your google personalized home page, right next to the weather.
reddit voting spam?
Good idea!  This might help guard against early mob mentality.  See this article for a nice description of why knowing what other people vote may influence your own vote:  http://reddit.com/info?id=2ljc Perhaps even add some randomness to the "hot" or "new" page.
It has cute creatures, though. In that way it's partly a pet-simulator, and those have huge appeal.
He doesn't mean procedural programming. Usually, in the context of graphics or animation, "procedural" means that the final models / textures / animations were not human-generated. Consider the walking animations. Apparently, no human animator created these (although they may have created sub-sequences). They're generated by analyzing the model's skeletal structure and creating gaits based on this. Karl Sims, Dmitri Terzopoulos, and Michiel van de Panne have done neat work in this area.
I suppose "algorithmically generated" would be clearer than "procedurally generated".
Can someone just go ahead and post the rest of the stories from folklore.org so we can get over it and move on? 
Wikipedia has a pretty good article on it, plus some great hi-res images:  http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Falkirk_Wheel
"(9) Tabs are a fixed width" Wtf? This would be crap. [regularly has dozens of tabs open at once]
Gracias por acordarme, cabrón! ;-) 
tagging.. what the hell are they thinking.
Doesn't work for me (I started on reddit after the move). It also doesn't prompt to save the password for me with Firefox on Linux.
On the contrary, IE's constant lack of status bar (I seem to have to turn it on manually every time I use the browser) is bloomin' annoying. To me.
And this is in some way news? This is exactly what all the experts were saying long before the war. (at least in non-american press)
this is a perfect example of a case where you should not use the original headline.  this is actually an interesting story but the headline is goofy. 
I love you
I agree.. see my similar suggestion from earlier: http://features.reddit.com/info?id=02378
I'd like to suggest we don't do this, so as to avoid too much editorializing.  let's let submissions stand on their own merit.
"This product requires Microsoft© Internet Explorer 6, Microsoft© Media Player 10, and Macromedia Flash 7." That's some great… web technology there.
"The Pentagon's initial plans for reconstruction crumbled when it encountered an unexpected foreign and domestic insurgency ... " Oh, OK, so there *was* a plan. 'But, Mr. Bowen concluded in a report focusing on the CPA's staffing, "[t]he unanticipated post-war collapse of virtually all Iraqi governing structures, substantially hindered coalition efforts to develop and rapidly execute an effective reconstruction program.' And that initial plan was insufficient to account for the "unanticipated post-war collapse."   The plan may have sucked, or have been insufficiently thought out, or maybe it really was the best posible plan given avilable information.   But that's not the same as there being *no* plan.
According to this report: "The Pentagon's initial plans for reconstruction crumbled when it encountered an unexpected foreign and domestic insurgency ..." We have previously been told (as at http://seattletimes.nwsource.com/html/nationworld/2002798415_iraqcia11.html ): "Pillar wrote that the intelligence community 'anticipated that a foreign occupying force would itself be the target of resentment and attacks — including guerrilla warfare — unless it established security and put Iraq on the road to prosperity in the first few weeks or months after the fall of Saddam.'" The "unexpected foreign and domestic insurgency" was altogether quite expected.
Touche. The phrase set off my BS-detector for some reason, but I think it doesn't mean what I thought it meant.
Can you offer an opinion on how their ideas differ from XP or Agile develoment?   It seems they've found a project management and development approach that works for them, whihc is great, but what I've read makes it sounds almost identical to agile development techniques.   
If you mean I (the submitter) was using hyperbole to increase people's enthusiasm and get up-votes there might be a bit of truth to that, but mainly I was echoing the description from the linked page, "looks like it could possibly be the best video game ever," while keeping the headline short. If I could title it again, I might say "Will Wright presents Spore - most promising video game ever."
Me too, but I wouldn't have to turn it on manually if the link target was displayed in the URL bar on mouseover. That's the point.
evolutionary game? damn! this alone jsutifies getting a faster computer.
A lot of people have pondered how to turn a website into a profitable business. Why not try the obvious, simple way?
You raise an interesting point. I've heard from my wife that they get between two and three candidates interviewing for a position at her school. That doesn't seem like an overabundance to me, but of course my evidence is anecdotal. My wife says that plenty of her university classmates were in the position primarily because they didn't know what they wanted to do. That kind of thinking could lead to too many people and not enough jobs. However, there are plenty of unfilled teaching jobs in CA (where I live). So much so that many teachers are teaching on emergency credentials. Essentially they haven't completed their credential courses but the need is/was so dire that they were allowed to teach. The other thing that's interesting is how many teachers are women. At my wife's school there is only one male teacher and he's about to retire. I often think that teaching is so low paying because it's thought of as a female profession. The men that do join the ranks of teachers seem to move up into administration more rapidly while their female counterparts tend to remain in jobs with proximity to students. My wife genuinely enjoys being with the kids she teaches and has no desire to move into administration. It may be that this acceptance of status quo, and the fact that teacher's pay isn't merit based, tends to keep salaries low.  I doubt there are any simple answers.
Of course there are too many PhDs and teachers.  Supply and Demand.  That's why teachers get paid crap.  If teachers quit to do something else, pay would have to increase to keep enough to run a school.  The only shortages I've ever heard of are for math/science teachers in highschools (I used to teach math in highschool, but hated it).  Even if a school can't find anyone qualified, there are dozens of unqualified or partially qualified individuals to fill the positions.  Most highschools have at least a few teachers that aren't certified in the subjects they teach. As far as grad school in math/science, I started in a bioinformatics program and quickly discovered that job opportunities weren't going to be many where I live (Arkansas).  I would only recommend a science path to someone who really loves math or science, who is willing to relocate, and who understands that they may end up working in another field anyway.
How long will it take people to realize that the only way people prefer to read things longer than a few pages is printed out...in an actual book?
If you've got the time and interest to blog about programming, you could put both to better use by learning Lisp instead. Then you wouldn't make sweeping pronouncements that make you look clueless about real programming. Smug? Of course I'm smug.  Comparing myself to the author of htis post will keep me self-satisfied and productive for a week.
no, since the guy who threw that rock was a third, there were at least 2 stones for each team left to play.  so it wasn't just a last resort but a fantasic shot.
This is just another example of someone with no background in economics thinking that they can make accurate armchair analyses of economic problems.  The entire argument, that when IQ and hours worked are controlled for, science jobs are the worst paid (which according to BLS data isn't even close to true anyhow), doesn't explain at all the discrepancy between men and women in the sciences.  When you only control for IQ and hours worked you can only attempt to explain why there are few people in general in the sciences, not why there are fewer women.  It doesn't address the question of why are men willing to take the pay cut and women aren't.  He of course tries to get around this obvious criticism by claiming that men are just myopic idiots who continue through what eventually becomes a 10 year investment just so that they don't have to admit to a career mistake.  You don't need to be a man to think that's offensive.   Larry Summers at least qualified his statements by saying that they were just ideas, this guy basically just asserts that men are dumb.  This sounds more like a tirade that would likely follow a tenure rejection than a serious attempt to address an interesting question.
that's just the top end of electric heaters! you have to go to a kerosene heater to get into 10000 BTUs... 
This is nice, becuase it's not silly stuff, however it's not fundamentally different than the great language shootout.
Oh my god, I can totally see that happening in real life too.
dupe of this story: http://reddit.com/goto?id=3983
no, I was just wondering if it was some voting up scam like the "orgasm" article the other day.
*she* ;)
Suuuuure they will. Please God, if anyone does get better than Google, let it NOT be Microsoft.
HEY NYT!  Will you PLEASE stop hiding your material behind registration forms? Sheesh.
That's all I had.
This is just revenge for what your hockey team did.
Интересно... а какое отношение к людям Вы извлекли из моего комментария? Мои действия по отношению к qrilka были абсолютно обычными: я "оценил" (с помощью стрелочек) так, как считаю нужным, его комментарии - по их релевантности к моему сообщению. Вся идея reddit.com как раз и построена на том, что люди оценивают статьи и комментарии так, как считают нужным, а система выводит объективную статистику. Кроме того, я не поленился потратить своё время и объяснить своё решение qrilka, именно потому, что стараюсь, чтобы здесь изначально была дружелюбная атмосфера - равно как и отвечаю на Ваше довольно-таки хамское сообщение. (Замечу в скобках, что я не только не являюсь автором сайта ru.reddit.com или reddit.com, но и не имею к авторам никакого отношения, кроме того, что попросил их сделать русскую версию сайта - ибо считаю этот сервис полезным). Вы же назвали мои действия "идиотизмом", а кроме того обозвали "клоуном" - и то, и другое абсолютно не согласуется с моими представлениями об этикете и нетикете - по-видимому, такой вольный способ обращения со словами является следствием относительной анонимности сети и (относительной) безнаказанности наездов и оскорблений. Жду Ваших извинений. 
Спасибо
I guess every field has its inbred lingo, that just makes sense to those in it, they forget it is foreign those outside of it.  For instance, try explaining the unix administration we do, parent forking child, parents waiting for children to die or killing defunct processes.  All kinda morbid outside the realm.  But makes sense to admins :)
If you noticed in the demo, any time you might need to create a custom object or whatever - a cataloge of ones created by other players is available. So for the non-creative types, the work is done for you.
Uh, no.  As an American, why would I know anything about how the British government works?  Also, I'm willing to bet ten thousand dollars that most Brits know more about the intimate details of the Spice Girls' lives than they do about the workings of their government.
clicky doesn't work, even if you ignore cert issues: [https://www.giveusallyourmoney.com](https://www.giveusallyourmoney.com) explanation of cert issues: [security.html](http://www.giveusallyourmoney.com/security.html)
Of course he knew.  After all, Bush is the one who called Nagin asking him to order manditory evacuations.
Harry Browne was the first presidential candidate I actually felt good about voting for -- the first one who wasn't just a "lesser evil," and the first one who didn't leave me worried that I'd regret having supported him if he actually won.
Well allow me to retort:  http://video.google.com/videoplay?docid=2835089920984627464&amp;q=owen+goal
Only targets "topics". Factbites is to Google as The World Book Encyclopedia is to The Library of Congress.
Ну количество может по-разному сказаться на качестве, так что я бы не считал его самоцелью. Но идея пригласить каких-нибудь хороших знакомых небессмысленна.
Not evolution at all.  This is intelligent design.
[someone set us up the bomb!!](http://www.answers.com/topic/all-your-base-are-belong-to-us)
Bush is right, Osama picked the candidate he wanted to be President and got his wish.
And in other news, water discovered to be wet.
Да, это верное замечание. Если, скажем, на сайт разом забредут 100 любителей JavaScript (или афтор жжот и т.д.), то ресурс для остальных групп выродится
Oh, that old myth. Look near the end of Crick and Watson's famous paper. Or to save you the trouble, as you don't seem to be very eager to check sources, I'll quote it for you: " [...] We have also been stimulated by a knowledge of the general nature of the unpublished experimental results and ideas of Dr. M. H. F. Wilkins, Dr. R. E. Franklin [...]". That "Dr. R. E. Franklin" is Rosalind Franklin, the woman "who never got any credit". I don't expect this myth to ever go away, though. It's too convenient for the feminists in University humanities depts with science envy. 
I think the Conlang Community is actually an ideal target for a subreddit. Linguistic tidbits galore and obscure constructed languages after all do not appear to most of the reddit community; whereas conlangers thrive on such things. Having said that, I imagine this posting will not be a very good way of measuring whether there exists a demand or not.  Contacting some conlanging community personalities and asking whether they think there would be interest, and whether they would be willing to advertise the conlang reddit on their pages would probably work: Richard Kennaway  http://www2.cmp.uea.ac.uk/~jrk/ Jeffrey Henning  http://www.langmaker.com/contact_form.htm Chris Bogart  http://www.quetzal.com/ Mark Rosenfelder  http://zompist.com/contact.html
well, let's not let the facts stand in the way of a good headline.
They still make games for the Dreamcast?
Here's an example: http://yummybanana.webgoonies.com/ I've seen plenty of others.  Troll del.icio.us enough and you'll find all kinds of barely disguised crap. 
I don't think there is any reason for a feature suggestion to show up in any other site, nor any URL to show up here.
id hit it.
It seems confusing to have all these language subreddits.  Instead, just let users set a preference as to what languages they are interested in, and then when a user submits a site, have them select the language it is written in.
In the future, you could even try to auto-select the language based on the URL content.
Deleting in protest of Reddit's new anti-user admin policies.
Might be this comment isn't getting enough attention: The article has been retracted because the journalist made stuff up.
How long will it take traditional forest-slashing book printers to realise PDF is the way to go - it weighs nothing in your bag, takes up no space in your apartment, and you can search the contents easily.
OK, can we just agree that folklore.org rocks and be done with it?  Seriously. 
What, the PUAs? Chill man, if it didn't have a name, we'd just call it flirting. Some are good flirters, others are bad. PUAs just have it as a hobby, just like some people schmooze for a hobby. The girls know they're getting flirted with, and it's not like brainwashing: If they choose to go home with a guy who's run PUA techniques, that's their choice. Besides, I'm definitely not a PUA myself, but there's still some effective techniques you can use for meeting women. It's doesn't have to be sleezy, you know. I have great fun using some of the stuff as an ice breaker, but on the other side I just do it to create a sense of play. It's fun and keeps the conversation going. And yes, giving it a name makes you more confident about what you're doing. What's the harm?
English language documents may still be of interest to Greek redditers (think something visual where language recognition is not required). Or more to the point, the vast vast majority of English content is likely to be of no interest whatsoever to non-anglophone redditers. Sorry--totally disagree.
It changes the rules a little, but it's not a camera permanently hidden in an unexpected location. It's not the UK's pervasive surveillance. It increases the effectiveness of police officers looking for cars. That can absolutely be a bad thing, but it's not a privacy violation.
Nor from the request subreddit.
So if English is of no interest to other readers, then they wouldn't select English as their prefered language.  English can be one of the languages too.
Yeah, that too. :)
Да дело скорее в качестве, чем в тематике -- вырождение тематики при большом количестве народу вряд ли случится.
Iduno. The IHT thought it was worth publishing. Maybe this editorial isn't as inane as wherever he advocated stripping voting rights from conservative Christians.
If the number of points a story has were not displayed and was replaced with some sort of up/down ratio display, this would no longer be a problem. That said, I completely agree with this idea under the current system. :)
I like the saved page being sort of like my bookmarks page.  I wouldn't mind having a seperate watch list though.
I'm voting down because I like the current proportion of sports stories on the main page. They are typically only sports stories that are of interest whether or not you are interested in sports. That's perfect for me.
I think Reddit suffers from a _lot_ of group think (ie mob stupidity). From observing my own behavior, I believe I am far more likely to click on links that have high scores regardless of what page I'm looking at ('hot', 'new', 'top', or 'recommended'). Obviously when I'm looking at the 'top' page I'm looking for links that everyone finds interesting, but on 'hot' and especially 'new' that shouldn't be my criteria (_my_ interest should be instead). To make matters worse, because I click on links that are modded up more often than links which are not modded up I tend to mod up links that are modded up more than others. Furthermore, I suspect that of the links I click on which are already modded up pretty high I mod up the ones which are modded up the most, and all of this despite the fact I am trying to avoid such behavior. It is just extremely hard to resist the pull of the crowd ("come on everyone thinks it's cool"). Maybe I'm the only one with this problem, but I doubt it.
Both serve a purpose.  I like holding a book, and curling up and reading it on the sofa.  PDF is great for searching.  It is a free market, if you choose to buy PDF, be my guest, if you like the paper version, go ahead too.  Because it takes cutting down trees to publishing books, doesn't make it a cardinal sin.  Tree's are a renewable resource.  People grow them to sell them for money.  If you don't trust me, maybe you might believe Patrick Moore - co-founder of greenpeace -&gt;   http://www.greenspirit.com/trees_answer.cfm (around page 12, it is long)
Just the one.
Bad versions of each of them rolled into one maybe. Does that make it a good game? I doubt an RTS fan would choose this over Starcraft, or a 4X strategy fan to choose this over Civilization. And so on. Of course this gives it all in one game world which might make it a fun game regardless, by being something different than any of its parts separately..  But the different game modes it presents don't really seem to benefit much from being in one game. At one point in a Spore game you'll be playing a bad Pac Man, then a bad Sim City, then a bad RTS. It didn't look that thrilling to me at any single point of the video.
Great for redditors who can only reddit during non-peak hours of the day.
No time limit. How about scores aren't shown on the "new" page. That might make a little more UI sense than for some things to have a score and some not, for no apparent reason. Also, you might want to make it a preference. So people can browse with scores on the new page if they want. You can reduce your own "herd mentality" if you like.
Wow, don't miss photo #6 of [Red Sea shipwreck](http://news.bbc.co.uk/1/shared/spl/hi/pop_ups/06/in_pictures_out_of_the_blue/html/6.stm).  Very different from all the rest.
But the summarisation is quite nice. I think the idea is the final version would be completely comprehensive. Actually the reality is they probably just want to be bought and merged with yahoo or google anyway.
This is interesting because I don't perceive any of disadvantages you've mentioned. Community, implementations, quality and documentation of libraries are more than good. So maybe it's just the difference of feeling (you say you don't feel it viable, I feel the opposite). Quite funny how feelings and emotions affect us! Just try (sbcl or openmcl) + ucw for web development. Happy hacking.
yes october 1, 2006
Kicked out/had to leave because of Iraqi non-compliance. Same thing. My point still stands though. The Iraqi war was over WMD and this UN resolution http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/UN_Security_Council_Resolution_1441 not about a link to 911.
Rush Limbaugh: Impeach Bush James Dobson: Impeach Bush That would be news. :-) Yawn.
perhaps he should consider paypal.   i didn't see where you enter your credit limit
You could just append a useless querystring, like ?x=y and reddit can't tell. This advice is for novelty purposes only. I can't be held responsible if you use it.
I am cautiously optimistic about this game. We are seeing something that is 4 or 5 months from 'feature complete', 7 months from 'gold' and it already looks somewhat fun. That's RARE in the game world. That means that rather than trying to get core systems working for 5 months, they're just making it FUN. They're making content. They're making it seamless and bug free (well, maybe I'm being optimistic). This bodes well for the game. But it is obviously a sandbox game... you either love 'em or you don't. I typically don't... I bought Sims 2, but played it mere only days before losing interest. However, other sandbox games have captured me for weeks. Simcity and Mindrover being salient examples. That's because I love designing for efficiency... how can I make the most effective robot or minimize traffic problems. Spore looks to be CHOCK FULL of that kind of gameplay... designing my creature to be effective in its environment, then effective in dominating it, then effective in subjugating the world, solar system, and the universe... the  portions of the game that have me refining my creature will occupy me for hours. How much I love this game will depend on how much slogging through OTHER types of less fun gameplay I have to do. But I'm optimistic. Will Wright hasn't made a stinker yet, and this one doesn't look to be his first. And damned if it isn't original. I'll buy it just for that, to thumb my nose at the sequal clogged publishers.
I like this idea. It's easy to implement, serves a valuable purpose, and is easy to explain in the UI. However, I would extend it to 15 minutes grace period... not everyone browses at peak times when a significant number of people will have voted within a mere 5 minutes. Perhaps a combination of number of votes OR time reached (new post warrenty good for 15 minutes or 15 votes).
I agree. I've learned not to click on the logo, because it does not do what I want. I think the suggestion has merit. And I also agree with the last suggestion... put a logo to the root 'reddit.com' somewhere else. Honestly, it doesn't even need to be at the top, in my opinion... if someone is going to a sub-reddit to start with, they may not really care about the main reddit. The homepage is not inherently that much more important than the subreddit in the mind of the visitor (again, IMO) so it does not necessarily require a link to it at the top.
Christ, I haven't felt that good since Archie Gemmill scored against Holland in 1978.
I'm not sure I agree. What if a feature really deserves recognition and discussion from the 99% of reddit visitors that will never visit features.reddit.com? Then again, I'm not sure I disagree either. Everywhere else, a link takes you somewhere else. These subreddits break that mental user model, and so would cause confusion on the main pages. All in all, I'm ambivilant. Edit: I'm also incapable of spelling ambivalent.
This fosters discussions... and flame wars. I'm ambivilant, I just don't see exactly what it brings to the table in terms of quality of content.
I'm not so sure, but that may be because of how I view the site... I go top to bottom, and open every link that looks interesting. I don't really pay attention to the ratings. Or I view the 'hot' list, and they are already pre-sorted by fresh group-think. Or I view the 'top' list, and they are already pre-sorted by old group-think. If I wanna see things by group-think, I choose the appropriate list. If I don't, then I'm looking at the new list, and why would I bother reading the scores on the new list? I can see how that perspective might be unique. But really... if you're reading the 'new' list, and you're still swayed by the numbers, why aren't you reading 'hot' instead?
Is this a suggestion, or a bad crosspost? I can't tell, because the idea seems semi-relevant to reddit, but as far as practically applying this site I cannot see a single way. Voting it down, but if someone can point out it's relevance, I might change my mind.
This would be nice. A 'hot history' so to speak... like a bestsellers list. Show the items that have made it into the 'hot top X in the past Y days'. This would be a great way to summarize results over time... more effective than the 'top' list because of having a better sort (by date, rather than value). This feature gets my vote. I think it's the best suggestion here, as far as adding valuable content, because it takes the most valuable, but very ephemeral content on reddit (the hot list) and makes it more persistent. Particularly for infrequent readers of reddit, this would add a LOT of value. Think of the quality of sites you'd get from a list of sites that hit #1 in the past 30 days. Very enjoyable reading for someone that only gets to reddit every now and then.
That was my first thought too. The message? You can sleep with a geek, or get screwed by Bill.
Please explain how they lack meaning.
Some useful tips, but it's such an old article, most of the tricky stuff has made its way into the language, and so there are much better, actually supported, ways to do them.
временно! 
And yet, somehow the Democrats were incapable of fielding a clearly better candidate who could win in 2004!  That is such an improbability that one would almost think it was a conspiracy. Now the talk is that they are going to run Hillary in 2008.  Considering that a large percentage of the country would vote for anyone but Hillary what are the Ds thinking?  Why would they want to lose again?
What's the difference? Do you think of your bookmarks as something more than a set of pages you periodically click on to see if anything changed?
I think this feature suggestion would fulfill your need better: http://features.reddit.com/goto?id=2nq9
I'm the author of that suggestion too. :)   They serve slightly different purposes, but you are right, either one would probably work.
[A more complete list](http://www.engadget.com/2006/02/27/wwjd-3-results/)
I made this suggestion: http://features.reddit.com/info?id=2nq9.  Perhaps it might solve the same problem.
Talk about confusing the issue. How is Bush's electoral success relevant to whether he should be impeached? It isn't supposed to be about popularity, one way or another.
I agree, but I'd argue that 'new' and 'hot' are essentially random enough. Many sites only have a 'top' list. This is tedious to anyone who is not a first time visitor. Better sites have a 'new' list... great for seeing the undiluted spam flooding the system. Reddit has a 'hot' list, equivalent to a minute by minute 'best sellers list' for links. For me, that's enough. I'm not sure a random function on every page is worth the space. However... I think some custom code for a 'random.reddit.com' would be nice, bringing up a random selection of reddit content (perhaps with a 'no negatives' filter). I don't think it should take up space on every page however.
Radirgy is the last one
I think this would make the overall results skwed, because you'd (perhaps subconsciencely) upvote bad links because they were by people you like.  We probably all do this already, but this would make it worse.
I think the lack of transparency helps keep the overall result more accurate and clean.
This seems like a great argument as to why Yahoo should buy Reddit.  For a lot of money. :)
Does anybody know when this video was from?  Because I'm seeing some very similar write-ups from March 2005, which would mean the stuff we're seeing was in place **A YEAR** ago.
I am personally against any feature that applies differently based on someone's karma.  It makes new users feel very unwelcome, and at this stage in the game it seems like Reddit would not to push users away.
This would be an undesireable feature if reddit would like to discourage extended discussion of links. Reddit might prefer to focus attention on new links.
I would prefer this method: http://features.reddit.com/info?id=2nwg "Show number of responses to a comment iff viewing that comment outside of its thread (in user pages)." But that also suffers from MyrddinE's concern. It encourages debate rather than brief topical responses to the post.
Its a good idea, just make sure there is a way I can mark a message as spam which will somehow impede the senders' ability to send more.
I am perfectly fine with the level of advertising on reddit. Do I really like graphical ads? No. Are they a necessary evil in order for sites like reddit to stay solvent? Currently, yes.
As long as it's only a URL, otherwise this would turn into friendster/myspace/facebook/et al.
pigs might fly really does a story with "might" in it deserve to be "hot"
I think this would skew the overall results.  It would probably be better to just hide which users submitted a story, as long as there was still a way to see other stories submitted by that user if I happen to like their stuff.
That seems like pretty much the same idea, except you'd have to go back to the thread every time the number changed just to see if they replied to you.
A lot of times I post a reply to someone elses comment that has a question in it.  I want a quick way to see 1) if someone did that to one of my comments and 2) if the poster responded to my question. You're right that it would foster flame wars, but chances are if you are in a flame war you're going to incessantly reload the discussion anyway.
Just because the author is a venerable computer scientist doesn't make him an expert in everything, which is how he presents himself in these essays. For instance, he thinks global warming is a good thing.
I think that just adds an extra step to my suggestion: http://features.reddit.com/info?id=2nof, but I upvoted it anyway because I like this idea too. :)
2000年の記事なので、弱冠ふるめ。
overlapping feature: http://features.reddit.com/info?id=2mma
C&amp;E Specialties is a leading provider of custom branded promotional materials - producing Post-It Notes, golf balls, umbrellas and virtually anything else you can imagine with your company's logo on it. 
I too have found the search feature to be less than helpful... not because it does not find the links I need, but because it does not display them to me in an order that I find relevant. The search is currently sorted with what appears to be a similar bias as the 'hot' filter... equal bias for age (young) and rating (high). This is fine if I'm searching for, say, interesting websites about 'fish'. But what if I'm searching for a CERTAIN site... I know it was on reddit a month or so ago... argh... it was about that guy in that movie... about his marraige. Lemme search for 'actor marriage'. The search is pretty useless in this case because it'll show me new stuff, and high ranked stuff, first, rather than items that have my query term more often. On a similar note, I'd like a feature suggestion: Build the keywords list (for search) from the target URL as well as from the link title and comments. This would make search vastly more useful. The current tendancy for 'cute' link titles makes them very poor candidates for valuable keywords.
Can someone explain this suggestion further? I do not understand what they are asking for.
If you really felt that it needed to be discussed by the general user base, you could submit a link on the main page to your feature request, so then someone could vote up your feature, but vote down your link on the main page to train their filter that they aren't interested in seeing feature requests.  By allowing crossposting, I'm really torn on how to vote if I like the feature but don't want it showing up in my recommended page.
I don't know what the author means by the "masses of academia", but at least in science, Linux rules.
I hope all these other ycombinator startups pay reddit for their advertising
This is not a Reddit feature request, as far as I can tell. Voted down.
I'm pretty sure this was a spam post, trying to drum up downloads for that product.  But I could be wrong.  Although given that this is Mike's first post, I suspect I'm right.
What timg is asking for is to allow an author to get automatic 'first post' on links that point back to themselves (like this one). The reason is because if his explanatory post gets modded down, or if other posts get modded above his, then the explanation will get lost in the conversation. The explanation of a 'no link' post like this one should be the first thing people see. It should be forced to the top somehow... perhaps by having a separate 'Details' field in the form for submitting a new link. However it is done, there needs to be a way to reliably annotate 'no link' posts so that the detailed description is the first thing someone sees when going to the comments.
Simple intro to the controversy.
We already have this topic; it's two weeks old and it has 40+ points. http://features.reddit.com/info?id=21uk
Having done quite a bit of searching, I can't seem to find a way to unbind/destroy arbitrary objects in Javascript. I've found myself wanting to do things like:  unbind(document.getElementById('foo').onClick) and having to rewrite the interHTML of the enclosing element instead. This is a big problem.
What struck me about what he said is that his same reasoning would justify the UK scheme. He said "There's absolutely no bar on collecting plates in public,..". Is there no bar to using the collected plate data to find out where anyone has been?
Wow, these have really been updated since last year, and I thought there were a lot then.
I am leaning against this idea. It's easy to post sites... many blogs make it easier with a +reddit button. There's no reason to auto-add 'I got some new toothpaste today!' from an RSS feed. The human touch to added sites, and the karma system involved, helps keep the number of spam posts down. We don't need to **automatically** subject ourselves to posts that nobody finds interesting and rate them down when (surprise surprise) nobody cares. At least with the manual system, **one person** thought it was worth adding.
I'm not so sure. Especially since the server already auto-logs you on via a cookie. You can't get much LESS secure.
It already exists, from the 'reddit' logo/label in the top left ocrner.
No one knows his true genius. Order his DVDs from Amazon, watch them, quote them, then watch them again. You will not be disappointed- he's amazing.
Dude's "[Ideology and Sustainability](http://www-formal.stanford.edu/jmc/progress/ideology.html)" reads like [Ted Kaczynski](http://www.thecourier.com/manifest.htm#2). No value whatsoever in discussing capitalist/objectivist/libertarian ideology? Or is that not ideology, from your completely objective standpoint?
I think that reddit should be indexing the target URL anyway, for search purposes. A vector generated from the index data would be a very accurate way of comparing it to existing content.
Users are confused by functionality, so we should remove it? I'm all for a lighter, faster KDE, but not a Gnome-like KDE with most of its features removed.
If you look at it as a right hand, then it's pointing toward the opposite direction.
59 seconds
+1
What about:  document.getElementById('foo').onClick = undefined; 
I am sad he's gone.  :(
IRONY ALERT: Soldiers fighting for our freedom aren't allowed to read free political expression themselves.
me too! the girl ain't so bad neither.
All three of these problems can be overcome with the use of a good javascript toolkit such as dojo. http://dojotoolkit.org
It gets worse: _"We're going to build the next generation of moderation on top of tags. That means we're going to poach your namespace.. We reserve the right to make changes that we think are necessary.. it could mean one day we consolidate and change all "canine" to "dog" tags. It could mean we define some system tag and usurp another tag."_  http://slashdot.org/faq/tags.shtml Could they possibly get tags less? When you try to overlay a taxonomy on a folksonomy you get the worst of both worlds. There'll never be enough moderators to keep the taxonomy clean, it'll never be as flexible and userfriendly as a folksonomy, and all the moderators will keep arguing about whether 'angel' should go under 'tv show' or 'pin'..
_"VD 17, which was previously categorised as a grade green ("merits careful watching") on the Torino scale of NEO hazards, has been upgraded to grade yellow, "meriting attention." There are two more grades beyond this, orange ("close encounter") and red ("collision is certain"), involving objects capable of inflicting regional or global devastation."_ Which came first, the hazard scale or the threat level?
From the Register article: "Let's face it, this is the only advertising campaign ever to give Linux programmers the vaguest hope that they might one day have sex with a real woman" That confirms my suspicion that real geeks don't read Eric Raymond.
Now that's the real God's Final Message to His Creation.
Most interesting. Anybody else see the parallel with seamonkey-&gt;firefox? Group of geeks spends a period of years building something ugly, slow to load and bloated that has no market share.* It becomes fashionable* to tell the world how much they suck. But all the infrastructure they're building is open and imperceptibly growing towards critical mass, until one day  a new group realizes it makes sense to refactor and rearchitect things to look and act pretty. Suddenly you have something aunt tillie could use. *- You have to count all the non-linux machines for the analogy with IE/windows to work. I'm not dissing KDE, people. *- http://www.joelonsoftware.com/articles/fog0000000069.html
reddit is social bookmarking with the bookmarking part done right, but it's a little light on the social interaction. One problem that I see is that article comments are the only means for users to interact with each other. Automatically making an infogami page associated with each reddit user would provide a great way for users to interact.
In Greek mythology the nine muses were believed to inspire artists, musicians, writers and poets.  Come see how they can help teach you about homeschooling, one of the fastest growing trends in education today.
People I know were saying, during the last election, if Bush was reelected he would be impeached.  The topic is not new and therefore, asking why the Ds would run a candidate like Kerry is an obvious question to ponder.
My first thought was amazing, my second was Black and White. I remember seeing B&amp;W hailed as the "greatest game ever" and eagerly snatched up my copy before they could put it on the shelf. But that was an incredible tech demo. I just think this time I'll let someone else be first. That terrible flash website EA has set up for it doesn't say a whole lot about it. Has anyone else seen anything else, like a projected release date?
submissions shown by all.reddit.com and reddit.com don't match. In particular, all shows fewer submissions for me than plain reddit. http://all.reddit.com/user/akkartik  http://reddit.com/user/akkartik
One might also wonder how much damage a few grams of metal and (often) less than a gram of stuff that looks like gound up pencil lead could do... but you shouldn't shoot yourself to find out.
The threat level came into existence a few months after 9/11; I think I remember reading about the Torino scale before then.
Not really. It works around them to various degrees of success. Their method of including uses synchronous XMLHttpRequests which in my testing proved unoptimal. For instance, over slow connections the request was *really* synchronous--Firefox wouldn't respond at all to any sort of user input. If you use &lt;script src=&gt;, sure your javascript doesn't run, but the rest of the browser does... I might like those big frameworks better if they had a (server side) compiler/linker style phase that eliminated all the calls in the library that weren't being used. -David
&gt; You can reduce your own "herd mentality" if you like. I am trying to reduce other people's herd mentality via this feature request. ;-)
I've been using this script for about 2 years now and I have to say it's absolutely great. I can't understand how anyone uses CVS without it, now that I'm used to it. Really, you should check it out if you use CVS.
... and neither are those who we are fighting for the freedom of (all of those in Iraq).
Now we can be almost certain that Google is merging with Sun.
Unfortunately, I just discovered the awesomness of Mitch like a month before he died.  I really would have loved to seen a show.
Implement collaborative filtering and surface "People who liked this link also liked..." on the info page.  You could also have "similar" links in the list for quick browsing to similar stories.
Information about a really cool free 1-800 number you call and have a real person perform Internet searches for you. Goodbye 411, finding information away from your computer just got so much easier....and it's free.
Asokoloski, Thank you.  It's refreshing to hear from someone that has a decent understanding of economics. Paul Graham once said that bad managers combine two qualities that are common by themselves but rarely seen together: Someone that has 1) little knowledge about a subject but 2) strong opinions about it. I would submit that this combination is much more common than he thinks - everyone has a strong opinion about economics, but very few have dedicated the time it takes to actually understand it. I can tell you, that as a four-year economic major, this little pet-project makes NO SENSE AT ALL.  If oil dependency is such a bad thing, don't you think those who use oil and rely on that dependency would have the foresight to switch?  Forcing decisions upon consumers &amp; businesses is not the answer.  You're essentially arguing that they don't have the intelligence to make the decision for themselves. I have news, that apparently is new, people are smart.  They will make decisions that are in their best interest, and in turn often in the economy's best interest as well.   If you were in a car, driving 60 mph towards a brick wall, would you stop? Would you try to go around that wall?  Or would you drive right into it?  The economy, my friend, reacts the same way.  We're not just going to wake up one day and run out of oil.  I submit to you that there will, in fact, be no "major" oil crisis at all.  The market will find the most economical alternative sources upon its own volition, as oil becomes less practical. No need for governments to force inefficient decisions upon the market through regulation, grants, and other distorting practices. Oh, and another comment regarding socialist governments.  It would do you will to understand their hidden costs.  Sure, giving to the needy today is great - just realize that when you do it, you're holding your country's future growth ransom.  If you don't understand why, take 4 years of economics.   Oh, and those who don't thank Sweden is forcing anyone to do anything, you need to spend some time living there.  For starters, lets talk about their taxes.
Man I hate the Register. Did they fire all the 13 year olds doing their reporting and hire 10 year olds instead?
I've been way too busy this week to even answer most of my emails but we have an irc channel going over at #startups on efnet (irc.servercentral.net) See ya there!
Wow, it's like the Despair posters, except not as funny.
I thought he was already impeached. I guess nobody respects the congressional powers of the San Francisco Board of Supervisors anymore.   http://sfgate.com/cgi-bin/article.cgi?f=/c/a/2006/02/08/BAG5JH4R4S1.DTL
Частично согласен. В качестве контраргумента можно привести создание subreddits (да и сам reddit имел - и имеет - явный лево-компьютерный уклон).
you really don't deserve to be on the internet. if it was SSL would that make you feel better?
Hmm... do I smell a [business model](http://pixoh.reddit.com)? ;-) Nevermind, my muffins are done.
今まで見てきた中では一番まとまってると思う。
When somebody noticed that end-users will click on adds or pay to use them.
Yes, I'm sure he *truly* wanted to strip the voting rights of conservative Christians. ... If a person can't joke about politics without being called anti-democratic, what should we joke about in a democracy?
mark it with (PDF)
佐野電磁の作曲過程がおもしろかった。全員の曲を聴ける日が楽しみ。
I dunno. Women always seem more interested if you seem less interested. Nothing makes her really want you like being a complete ass. … Or so it seems sometimes.
Wiki系サイトのみを対象とした検索エンジンらしい。
際限ない価格競争がいずれサービスカタストロフの招くのではないかという指摘らしい。カリフォルニアの電力問題とかを思い出すね。
mortgage and home loan news for australia
There's some interesting commentary over at Gamespy: http://www.gamespy.com/articles/595/595975p1.html Apparently he was very much inspired by the demoscene, and the 64k shooter games...
Okay, I'll come clean.  I do know a little about how their government works.  I know they have a parliament, a prime minister, and a useless royal family that everyone obsesses over.  I also know that, although they like America have a semi fascist government, Brits and many other Europeans like to spend time criticizing Americans as if they are much different - which they are not. All western governments are essentially the same at the core.
You'd expect that to work, wouldn't you? So did I. It doesn't.
Such a button only makes sense in X-Windows system, because highlighting things messes up the middle-button. To the majority of people using Windows or Mac, the button would be worse than useless. → Extension.
Ah, but your reply is *also* in ASCII.
I don't want "group think" affecting what I see on reddit at all if I can help it. "Group think" doesn't just mean a group of people think something is cool it means a group of people irrationally think something is cool. This occurrs because people have tendancy to affirm each other. You can read more about it [here](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Group_think).
I think reddit should have links to all the online games so we can waste more time online instead of doing actual work.
take the job of eHub, weblist, etc ...
my.reddit.com
The problem isn't that AT&amp;T wants to charge its customers extra for the bandwith. The market could sort that out easily enough. The problem is if Google pays Level3 for a fat pipe and lots of bandwidth and I pay AT&amp;T for DSL, AT&amp;T wants to charge Google to prevent the connection from being throttled when I try to download video from Google.
um ... duh?
Use the session saver extension and it is trivial. 
A pretty good article, but the very last sentence really annoyed me. I'm sure you guys can see why.
I think your sarcasm detector needs new batteries.
WARNING: This crashed my machine so hard it rebooted.  Too bad, it looked very cool for the 30 seconds it was working.
Hillary is talking about running Hillary in 2008; a candidate has to win enough primaries to get the party nomination.  Sure in the old days the nomination was determined in a smoke-filled back room, but those days are over.  Democrats are divided over Hillary.  The anti-war wing of the Democratic party (which has to be the vast majority at this point) really does not like her since she sitll supports the Iraq war even at this late date.  If she changes her mind now and decides to be against the war (and she is making noises like that now) it will just look like pandering. My guess is that she won't win enough primaries in 2008 to get the nomination.   
Maybe the New page should not show the number of points an article has received?
I think the article is saying the opposite - the wisdom of crowds works regardless of the barrier to entry. The only requirement is that people must vote blind, not telling each other about their choices.  Richard Dawkins said something similar about the stupidity of the jury system; http://www.simonyi.ox.ac.uk/dawkins/WorldOfDawkins-archive/Dawkins/Work/Articles/1997-11-16trialbyjury.shtml
very good. A pleasure to read (and understand!)
I do expect it to work and it did... in Firefox. Explorer seems to barf on it. You can set it to an empty function though:  document.getElementById('foo').onClick = function() {}; my test: http://www.porkrind.org/tmp/test-js1.html -David
Я извиняюсь только за то, что не сдержался и высказался довольно резко. Возможно, извинюсь за содержание комментария, если Вы прокомментируете свои слова: &gt;&gt;хочется, чтобы наверх попали комментарии про  &gt;&gt;распространение информации о ru.reddit, а   &gt;&gt; не офф-топик :).  &gt;&gt;  &gt;&gt; ИМХО, не стоит так сильно обращать внимание   &gt;&gt; на рейтинг - это условность, и не в нём дело Может я неправильно понял, но мне кажется, что смысл такой: посты - оффтопик, но главное - они мешают подняться моему топику наверх. А про рейтинг вообще непонятно. Зачем тогда его придумали, если он - просто условность?
IE and Firefox (by default) allow two simultaneous HTTP connections to the same domain. If you're using both of them up at once then the requests will seem synchronous. But the article wasn't about AJAX requests: Problem 1's solution is dojo.require (kind of-- except this is not completely asynchronous yet, which may be the cause of your problems. It's not impossible to write your own asynchronous 'includer' however.) Problem 2's solution is dojo.lang.hitch(scope, meth) or prototype.js's .bind() which returns a function wrapper around the bound method Problem 3's solution is dojo.lang.inherit  
To be honest - and this despite the fact that I posted this link - I don't think this review is nearly up to Ars' usual technical standard.  But maybe that's just me.  :-)
Apparantly someone did the exact same thing about a year ago..   http://www.opelgt.com/forums/humor/5530-careful-thing.html A few things have changed - the cat is called Tabby in one, and Spaz in the other story.
stunning
I don't see the problem. I'd allow that girl to sleep with me and afterwards she could do my sociology homework. No problem at all.
A really interesting article on why people can be so nasty for no apparent reason.
The Importance of creating User Profiles and Personas and a comprehensive guide to do it.
Um. So it was discussed at some point before the 2004 election. Ok. You're still going to have to explain how that relates. Where does "And yet," come from?
"Smalltalk and Lisp's sex parties" Someone needs therapy... ;)
るびこさん（id:rubyco）も参考にされているようなので。
Коллекция ссылок на ресурсы
This is quite possibly the most linked to tutorial on the net.
Пресс-релиз напишите и разошлите в места типа webplanet/itnovosti и т.д. С учетом того, что это приход в зону .ru довольно известного в англоязычном инете сервиса, практически уверен что опубликуют (если конечно выдержать некое минимально требуемое качество текста).
Problem #1: I remember my real problem now. I couldn't get eval to create new global function objects.  Test:  function f() { eval('function a() { alert("a"); }'); }  f(); a(); dojo works around this by making everything you include go in a namespace. I wasn't happy with that workaround--it just clutters up the code too much. As for problem 2, yeah, you can use something to wrap it up, or just create a local variable in the closure, but the point of the article was that you just shouldn't have to. It's a deficiency of the language that you have to do it at all. Problem 3 isn't as bad as the others. Dojo and every other library have solutions that are tolerable. But it really should be better supported by the language.
The Christian view of children.
Can't take anything away from this guy...(no pun intended)..
It works if and only if the property is bound using javascript, not if it's written in the HTML directly. That's what I'm having a problem with. You've clarified the problem, anyway: you can use delete and object=undefined on DOM object properties created by your script at runtime, but not properties that are set as HTML tag attributes. What I'm really trying to do is a little more complicated: I'm trying to delete the hrefs from a series of links and add onclick handlers after a page loads so that it will have static navigation links in browsers without javascript and DHTML otherwise ([more details](http://foobar.infogami.com/blog/js_anchors)). All the links are neatly organized in a span, so I had no trouble getting the effect I want by rewriting the innerHTML of the span. I'm just annoyed that I can't do this in a more direct way. The point of the DOM, as I understand it is to manipulate the elements on your page as objects with properties instead of strings.
I know how bayesian filtering works. It's good for automated tagging or automated subreddit catagorizing. However, I don't see how you can use it for duplicate post detection. I've got a discussion [here](http://features.reddit.com/info?id=2mgn).
hmmm cool name + cool logo does not a decent website make. I could crop and resize a picture in MS Paint if I wanted to! Just because it's web-based doesn't make it interesting. (This crop of new web stuff is beginning to look like the dregs on Sourceforge - just they're getting publicity due to cool web tricks...)
1) По поводу оффтопика.  Речь шла про комментарии к данному посту. Данный пост имеет тип 'self' - т.е. не ссылается ни на какой url, а предназначен исключительно для проведения обсуждения. Темой обсуждения я выбрал следующую: "как пропагандировать reddit среди широкой публики" - ибо я считаю этот сервис полезным, и хочу, чтобы большо хороших людей про него узнали и им воспользовались. Если кому-то не нравится такая тема, или он считает, что интереснее обсуждать другую - чтож, "стрелочки" и кнопка submit доступны всем. С помощью стрелочек я и оценил комментарии к этому сообщению - исключительно по релевантности к данной дискуссии. Это моя позиция - я считаю сообщения qrilka *не релевантными* данному топику (не плохими, не скучными, не банальными, а именно не *релевантными*). Кроме того, мне хотелось (естественно), чтобы на верх попали топики, относящиеся к теме распространения reddit - чтобы легче было увидеть новые идеи и соответственно их обсуждать. Свой выбор я также объяснил qrilka - хотя мог бы и промолчать. Разумеется (и к счастью), я не единственный пользователь данного сервиса - у других пользователей другие мнения, предпочтения и интересы, и они также могут их выражать (стрелочками / новыми сабмитами). Just go ahead! 2) По поводу рейтинга. Создатели рейтинга придумали рейтинг сообщений и новостей с тем, чтобы фильтровать интересное/неинтересное,  а рейтинг пользователей (карму) - с тем, чтобы стимулировать пользователей постить интересные новости, получая за это абстрактные положительные или отрицательные очки. Мне кажется, что рейтинг новости или поста не стоит воспринимать лично - это оценка не человека, их запостившего , а лишь его действий, причём относительно случайной группой людей, на которую ты не имеешь никакого влияния. Поэтому, кроме разве что информации про то, насколько посты/комментарии интересны *этой* группе людей, другого содержания оценки и рейтинги не несут. Именно поэтому, ИМХО, не стоит на них сильно заморачиваться, и переносить эти оценки на собственную персону. Кроме того, насколько я понимаю, оценки _комментариев_ на карму не влияют. 3) Карма это вообще интересная вещь - достаточно скоро в reddit появились так называемые "karma whores" (кармовые проститутки?) - люди, постившие новости не потому, что они интересные, а для того, чтобы повысить карму - а тренд прослеживался явно, достаточно было (на начальном этапе существования reddit) послать что-то из Пола Грема (Paul Graham), или про Lisp vs. Python, или про Javascript, или из joelonsoftware, dilbertblog.typepad.com или других успешных блогов. Так что высокая карма - то ещё не показатель качества "работы" постящего ;). 4) Извинения за форму принимаются.
За пропаганду Лиспа мы конечно будем ставить стрелки вверх ;-!
КГ, но автор блога -- не мудак :)
かなりボリュームのある解説。
To get one you have to have a .net passport - Microsoft probably reckon that it is worth it just to get their hooks into you.
*This material may not be published, broadcast, rewritten, or redistributed.* ?
hahahaha.  it's funny because it's true
Yo the Elders of Zion are a hoax, aren't they?
The easy way around it is to use BugMeNot. It works for me.
Is he still in the same think-tank?  Is this madman still an influence on [the otherwise sane?] Bush Administration?
lol. I came here to make exactly that comment. To the letter. Beaten to it.
Ah!  Will do.
"The only problem with sorrounding yourself with bright people..." is that "sorround" ain't a word and I ain't gonna use it
I'll stick with Picasa (anxiously awaiting Linux "version"). Pixoh is still an interesting example of new web apps.
And you thought getting into MIT, Harvard, and Princeton was *hard*?
For sure there are two things in life you have to pay for: the confort and the stupidity.
Great streaming presentation. Don't mistake this for a dupe of one of his blog entries. &gt;The key to marketing is to be like the president; High and to the right. :)
Excellent!
Nice!
Test it! :)
Nice but seems outdated.  Says Sets are being "considered".
Would this be on Reddit if the headline were: "Exxon CEO argues: Computer Science would be better off without macros"? I don't think so.
I take it that the picture in the article is **not** the East River.
My statistics supervisor used "the end of the world" to illustrate confidence intervals. If I remember right, we can be 95% certain that the world won't end in the next 40 years...
Ugh, please don't bring back the images of Eric Raymond having sex.
As usual, smart people think their ideas in fields in which they are not experts have weight. 
Well, yes. But it's still interesting how relevant some media sources have become *because* their content is linkable and discussable. (The Globe Mail versus National Post, for example.) A slightly related counterexample is Gmail. With the "accounts" feature, they let me use the Gmail interface without even using a Gmail address. Because they've allowed that, my eyeballs are viewing their ads. Otherwise, they wouldn't be.
As someone who is familiar with it, I can assure you that it is not. Most students cant afford to pay tuition in US universities. ( Ofcourse, it doesnt apply to the Infosys founder. )
Any parent could have told you this.  Can I apply for a research grant to pay for me watching my kid?
Shouldn't that be "Don't use our software..." for those girls that don't want to need constant help with their computer problems?
Maybe I'm not to the curvy part yet, but emacs has a very nice underlying consistency.  Everything is written in lisp (or appears as a lisp function and could have been), the keybinds have a great kind of self-consistency... C-x b switches to a buffer, C-x 4 b switches to a buffer 'in the other window'; C-x f 'finds a file', C-x 4 f finds a file in 'the other window.'  Being able to run an 'apropos' and find functions and key-bindings along with the extensive, precise online info documentation makes it all pretty easy to learn.  In many ways, I consider emacs to be one of the easiest and most consistent applications I've ever used; it also happens to be one of the grandest in scope.
Yes... And I have a strong suspicion that the author was in fact aiming for a *humourous* article rather than an *informative* one. Man, some people!
&gt; This page assumes the law of conservation of energy. If you don't understand that, look at  law of conservation of energy. I don't know why people have such a fixation on the first law of thermodynamics when it comes to these sorts of issues.  If conservation of energy was the end of the story, then we wouldn't even need oil since we could just pump 'energy' straight out of the ground.  In fact, we are looking for materials with lower relative entropies than their surroundings, we are looking for 'hot' objects (or objects that can make themselves hot) such as coal, oil, the sun, volcanoes etc.  From an esteemed academic I would expect much better, even if he is far from his own domain.
Maybe you could explain, just in case we don't.
emacs is great. it's odd at first, but after a few days, your fingers get trained to do silly things like hit control-y to paste. Then you discover emacs macros, dired, and customizable modes, and you never look back. some people even use it to read their email (the horror!)
Can't wait to see more of this!  Beau (the author) has more than one trick up his sleve! Good luck!
&lt;Quote&gt;  A recent weekend travel trip from Bangalore to Hyderabad proved to be rather expensive and left me with a bad experience. Let me give you a a little insight into the events that changed my views about an Airline I considered among the best when it came to customer service.  &lt;/unQuote&gt;
And critics think people can only have intelligent, informed opinions in fields in which they are experts.
First I thougt that how dumb it is to move the cursor with ctrl-p, ctrl-n, ctrl-f and ctrl-b since the arrow keys are just 10cm away, but after learning the proper use of them (and the meta-moves) can't really see why keyboards even have the arrow keypad ;) Since learning Emacs keys I have surpised how usefull those are. Even bash console is nicer when I can use reverse search (ctrl-r) instead of "history|grep command". 
That's what I thought too. When my wife was hearing about the 9/11 assaults, she was in tears, then my 13 months old daughter came and tried to comfort her bringing all her plush animals from her bed into the kitchen. 
Make sure you read these in his voice. They're just not funny otherwise.
Yawn!
Not leading scientists or entrepreneurs.   Management gurus- yes.  Ever heard of IIT-IIM?   
Here's the thing: articles that are modded up get old pretty fast; I usually spend my time the "new" section, scanning for interesting stuff. I think this might be because I'm used to reading hundreds of items from my delicious subscription...
Correlation != causation  You only see little old ladies so tall women must die younger.
It's time to take up the fight. Avoid "clipped waveforms, upper midranges boosted to ear-screeching levels, maximised, loud and harsh or ultimately just dead sound." You thought your old CDs from the 80s and 90s sucked? Think again!
This is not even old, this is ANCIENT. ps. emacs is the best editor.
Looks interesting, I'm off to smoke a fat bowl and settle down to read it.
"competent advice to smart young people": Don't believe everything you read on the Internet.
MS usually does interfaces well. Linux is still playing catchup. The difference is smaller, but still there. We're used to it and we are willing to deal with it, and we do so without thinking half the time because we know how things work behind the scenes. Not so for nongeeks.
@borga: Are you  using BioBike? What are your experiences?
&gt;Let's face it, this is the only advertising campaign ever to give Linux programmers the vaguest hope that they might one day have sex with a real woman. Probably the reason Microsoft pulled it after two months.
The pics are all broken links for me. :(
I feel the best way to market Python is to use Python (when no one is looking if it's an unofficial language).  Unless the observers are braindead, the results can usually speak for themselves. There's a chance for exposure even to non-technical people, using combos like NSIS, McMillian's Installer and Tkinter to make powerfull Win32 tools quickly can show the potential even to them. Besides, "marketing" a technology is tawdry.  If it's such a sin for for AJaX, RoR or "R", how would it be any better for Python?
This is an interesting situation. Since, presumably, the Reddit database has your IP address... would the owners of Reddit go to jail if they didn't report you to the DEA? After all, you just admitted that you are about to partake in a crime. If I admitted I was going to rob a bank or harm a politician, would not Reddit have some responsibility to report me to the FBI? ON EDIT: I do not support the war on drugs. I was just making a point about how stupid laws against non-violent personal behavior are.
They seem to be loading tons of javascript and it shows in the time taken to load the page. Not sure if they use are using compression for js.
Microsoft's interfaces suck, actually. Apple is where good interfaces come from. Microsoft poorly and inconsistently imitates them. Oh, and now Apple is adapting interface elements from KDE. 
Detecting the language of documents can be done automatically realtively easy and reliably.  Messages of certain languages have a typical information entropy and typical frequency distributions of their characters.
From the article: But even after litigation has put so many P2P networks on the back foot, one billion songs are downloaded illegally &lt;i&gt;every month.&lt;/i&gt; [Not every week, as the reddit title suggests.]
If it's wrong to vote down entries with non-descriptive titles, I don't want to be right. (^_^)
how about introducing a fixed time period delay? You can vote and see your own vote but not see anyone else's vote within the last say 24 hours. That would at least delay the groupthink effect by 24 hours.
M-x all-hail-emacs!
This seems kind of pathetic and sad to me.  I don't think Python needs to feel threatened by "buzz" for Ruby (even calling it "the R language").  I like Ruby and Python but they're very different despite the superficial similarity.  Why should they have to compete?  Why should the success of one threaten the other?
That is so freaking retarded.  Those corporate types have no idea how the blogoshere social networks work. They are so paranoid about protecting their precious content, that they are shooting themselves in the foot. Idiots.
From the Touch Clarity site: &lt;quote&gt;  You only have a few page impressions to keep visitors or lose them. If they do not see a compelling reason to go further, they're gone. Any visitor who lands on any page of a Touch Clarity Targeting enabled site is individually served the most relevant content and promotions, leading to $multi-million annual revenue increases for our customers.   &lt;/qoute&gt; Maybe a way to monetize the Reddit algorithm?
And the FBI cares about one person smoking a bowl? Besides that, Reddit can probably get away with letting posts slide if they take special care not to monitor posts. If their policy is not to act as gatekeepers, they wont be expected to act as gatekeepers. Since they have moderation systems which are intended to act as the control, they don't. I doubt they have any legal obligation to report that, especially given how much trouble it would be for what  has a 50% chance of being a sarcastic remark.   
Det at Google har gitt søkerdata til myndighetene i Kina er jo helt håpløst, i et kommunistisk land som Kina burde de vite bedre.
Well, the DEA would care about your bowl.  Obviously you mean to sell pot to all the 9-year olds in your neighborhood.  /sarcasm It blows my mind that poor Nicole Richardson got ten years for passing along a phone number, the injustice of it shakes me to my soul. You'll excuse me, but I'm going to do some drugs myself right now.  By this, I mean I'm going to have a beer and then smoke some tobacco.
i tried stun-gunning myself in the arm about 10 years ago...it wasn't pleasant, but it wasn't debilitating either. that unit had a 9v battery too. maybe they vary in strength a lot, but my personal opinion is that this story is bunk.
Pathetic and sad? If you haven't noticed, Ruby is becoming popular fast simply because of RoR. While Ruby is a much better language than PHP, PHP itself (a pretty poor language) became very popular simply due to being great for making web apps. And at this point, it is the defacto standard for web apps, and thus it will continue to thrive on no matter how many problems it has. What is Python the defacto standard for? When people think of web programming, they think of PHP or Ruby. When people think of systems programming, they think of C. When people thing of hardware intensive apps (such as games), they think of C++. Embedded languages? Lua is quickly taking over that market. And that's not a good place for Python to be. No matter how good of a language it is, if its just seen as an alternative to all of those languages for different types of apps, it will continue to lose momentum, to a point where using Python isn't as effective as it could be because all the programmers and libraries are in other languages. Python is a great language. Unfortunately, it will become quickly overshadowed if it isn't marketed effectively. That's one things that RoR guys got right: how to market something. Ruby lacked it before RoR, and the massive increase in popularity shows this.
Maria Montessori knew this in the early 1900s.  The observation that very young children enjoy participating in everyday "practical life" activities like cleaning dishes, washing tables and cooking food is one of the basic foundations of the Montessori method.  Young children also enjoy caring for others, and especially for younger children than themselves.  It gives them a sense of importance and fulfillment.  Montessori encourages this because it is the best way to develop character attributes in children that will help them throughout their lives. http://www.michaelolaf.net/1CW36famcare.html
Gjør gjerne om menyen til norsk men jeg synes at vi skal kunne få lov til å vise sider fra utlandet også, det er like viktig det også.
And by the way, if you're using Windows, try XKeymacs: http://www.cam.hi-ho.ne.jp/oishi/indexen.html It's a utility that gives you Emacs keystrokes in all your applications (configurable by application).
This lead in is quite misleading. Guido posts twice and one of the posts he says "you'll have to do this without me" which is hardly joining in! Of course, he's right - there's no need to market python per se. Just implement applications that people love and the reality will sink in.
who would've thought
my favorite quote: "No other animal is as altruistic as humans are. We donate to charity, recycle for the environment, give up a prime subway seat to the elderly tasks that seldom bring a tangible return beyond a sense of gratification." yes, and no other animal is as selfish, greedy, destructive or has means to amplify its weaknesses upon the rest of the world like we do..   
Direct link to the comic is here:  http://www.penny-arcade.com/images/2006/20060303.jpg Its the friday, march 3rd comic, titled "The Forbidden Fruit".  (Just in case anyone reads this monday and wonders WTF)
Deleting in protest of Reddit's new anti-user admin policies.
Here it is in google maps   http://maps.google.com/maps?f=q&amp;hl=en&amp;q=austin,+tx&amp;ll=30.081498,-97.140427&amp;spn=0.056148,0.08626&amp;t=k Crazy.
what you're basically saying is that in order to fill the void in your otherwise empty life, you strive to read every scrap of geek news on the internet.  Thanks for letting us know where you stand.  Thanks also for being a jerk to the people who have never seen this before.  People like you reinforce the stereotype that smart people are arrogant and lack basic manners.  Why don't you apply some of your impressive brain power towards social skills, instead of trying to make the submittor feel dumb? -A well-rounded nerd
They have a reason for it.
'"Those are young, impressionable minds those people have control over. We don't need those liberal academics doing what they're doing. I find that offensive," said Fox, a Republican who graduated from Parsippany High School.' He finds it offensive that they're exercising their right to free speech, and having an open debate? That's pretty scary.
"What is Python the defacto standard for?" Hacking.
いままで見た中で一番わかりやすい、atomic operationの解説
Lisp
great!
Bittorrent is python, right?  That's a hugely, hugely popular app. One big thing Python's got is cross-platform GUI app development with wxPython.  I use the wx toolkit constantly in Perl, and but wxPython is more widespread, well-documented, and easy to use thatn wxPerl, and wxRuby was dead in the water last I checked. 
You can't reduce this to supply and demand.  The employers in education are overwhelmingly public institutions (esp. below the college level). These employers can't arbitrarily up their salary offers to retain or attract teachers.  Teachers aren't paid poorly because there is a large supply and comparatively little demand; they're paid poorly because the funding available for public education is limited, and because much of it is poached by textbook publishers, educational consultants, administrators, and other sources. In fact, I would say that teachers are faced with something approximating price-fixing or monopolization: they are free to leave their positions if they aren't satisfied with their pay, but all the "competing" employers they can move to are paying the same wage. Regarding your experience: yes, to be a successful academic, one must be flexible about where one lives and works.
How about not deleting the hrefs--leaving both the hrefs and the onclicks? I do this on some of my pages. That way the user sees the where the link would go to and can even bookmark it or open it in a new tab, but if you just click it doesn't really load the page... Just make sure you return false from you handlers so the link doesn't activate. -David
yeah
So what are you feelings on xemacs then?
And this is comparable, because the country was founded on the slavery, oppression, and abuse of conservative Christians?  Conservative Christians have never been considered sub-human, never had to fight for equal treatment under the law, never been largely confined to ghettos lacking in basic social structure or ways to get out. Christians run the show in the US, and currently the conservative variety are the ones running our government.  Black people actually *have* been denied the suffrage for the majority of our country's existence, and while you certainly could joke about how they don't belong here after their ancestors were forcibly ripped from their homeland to be tortured, it just makes you look like a big fat jerk. Sorry for going on so long about this, but it really got me riled up.  It really is such an unthinking comparison, and I think it's only perpetuated because it makes for good partisan slamming.  (And seriously, WorldNetDaily?  That's like tattooing "nutjob" on your forehead, or linking to Arianna Huffington.) And finally, as an end note, Garrison Keillor seems to be a fairly religious Chrisitan, though not conservative.
He argues that mandatory registration hurts free online readership, which is obvious.  He makes very little attempt to relate this to an actual business model.  (A side reference to SEO, and the phrase "leverage themselves onto the internet", are as close as he comes.)
Wrongly crossposted to features.reddit.com... voted down.
Wrongly crossposted to features.reddit.com... voted down.
set href to javascript:void(0);  That will work correctly.  so you would have something like: function decoratelinks() {   var links = document.getElementsByTagName("a");   for( var x = 0; x &lt; links.length; x++ ) {  links[x].orig_href = links[x].href;  links[x].href = "javascript:void(0);";  links[x].onclick = function() { eval( "alert( '" + this.orig_href + "');"); };   }  }
Wrongly crossposted to features.reddit.com... voted down. If you meant this as a feature request, then please explain exactly what feature you want in reddit.
Um, as stupid as those laws are, they don't require message board operators to read every post. No, the owners of Reddit are not liable for failing to report a crime that they are unaware of, and have no reason to be aware of. They are not being negligent by not reading HPK's post. Totally irrelevant to the war on drugs.
Agreed. Sometimes I see links on the features/request and downvote them because I don't think they belong on the main reddit. However this downvotes them on the main subreddit.
Also try: * pant  * blowjob  * jump  * lesbian  * strip  * wash 
Sounds like [my proposal](http://features.reddit.com/info?id=21qs) for user submitted similar links
This is my personal opinion... but social interaction is overrated. Many people come to online forums looking for similar minded people. I come to online forums looking for interesting ideas. Even if someone has the most insightful, interesting, informative post ever (/. meme spreading...) my interest extends to that post alone. I really don't care about the person behind it, so extra interaction schemes to assist me in forming some kind of community with the other people are completely lost on me. On __me__, I'd like to reiterate... others might find it useful. I would not.
my estimation is more like first signs at the end of this year and almost certainly in less than 3 years
Because everyone lives in the US.
I think letting people take a simple test to find out if they think rationally about political issues might not be the worst idea. That would filter out conservative christians among others.
Test: http://www.porkrind.org/tmp/test-js3.html
Er bare postet en gang, denne. Finner du flere så gi meg beskjed.
Oopsie, I didn't notice, heh. The 'hot' list is the finest feature of reddit. Relative activity of a link is a fabulous measure of the value of a link. Did a link get the most interest during the past 10 minutes? Most click-throughs, most vote-ups? Then it's the hottest item! (Yes, I know the hot algorithm is more complicated than that). Even if the item falls off in interest quickly, it's still an excellent measure of relative quality, because it's essentially competing on a relatively even field... competing with the other new links only. The 'top' list is an uneven field... because they show up on the 'top' list, they get more people seeing them, and thus more votes, KEEPING them on the top list. But 'hot' only stays hot while it's on the 'new' and 'hot' lists. It gets a boost once it makes it to the 'hot' page, but it at least has an even chance with the other 'new' items to get to the 'hot' page. So 'hot' is the best determiner for link quality, in my opinion, rather than absolute value. Absolute value is also a good determiner... but it's less INTERESTING. It's less fun, less unique. It's also harder to pick a cutoff value, because that cutoff will change over time... as reddit gets more popular, the same quality link will get a higher score as more people vote on it. But the hot list is rather absolute... either you made it to the top #5 or not. More links won't change that much, nor will more users. So it's a more consistent metric, less dependant on the quantity of users voting.
Who writes the test?
Sketching tool to generate comic strips.  Try it
New drawing tool. Check it out!
You're right, that is better. Voted the feature request up. :-)
I really question the sanity of anyone who is prepared to take advice from someone like this guy. The other articles on that site are even more cringe-inducing. Perhaps instead of "playing the game", he could spend time to expand his vocabulary to include words other than "vibe".
This reads well until you get to the last paragraph.  Then you realize the guy's basic assumptions and it all becomes sadly hilarious.   "So how do you raise kids to be high achievers... ?"  
I'm guessing you mean links that go nowhere but to the comments page? They're like the semantic equals of '(nt)' labels on forums... a comment that is in the subject line only and has no body. Perhaps a small graphic that has '[NL]' (No Link)... capital NL inside a box, with alt text 'No Link'. It could be done in CSS too, if using a small image was distasteful. Placed at the end of the url, before the (domain.name), it would have the same semantic placement as well, and I think many people would understand its purpose after following one or two of them.
Yeah, as it happens, I'm in the UK.  I'd move to the US, but I hear they have shitty drug laws, and the weed's more expensive.
"Ruby lacked it before RoR, and the massive increase in popularity shows this." Perhaps. But most Rubyists could give a rat's ass if Ruby became uber popular.   Ruby was showing gradual, steady popularity growth before Rails.  Had this simply continued, that would have been great.  And it would have avoided the conflation of Rails with Ruby itself.  It's nice that so many people have heard of Ruby, but less so if all they know or bother with is a single framework API.  If these people go on to learn actual Ruby, great.  But that remains to be seen. Ruby sells itself; killer apps are nice, but not required.
I love the expression "partake in a crime". Very funny. "I'm just off to rob that bank, care to partake?"   
So how long has it been around? There's a date on the image itself, from 2004...
wow, i never realized these things were so dangerous. this is good to know.
再放送じゃないのが残念。
&gt; I'm guessing you mean links that go nowhere but to the comments page Yes. 
If anyone wants a good read, check out the Consumer Union's Guide to Licit and Illicit Substances. It was published by the same non-profit that writes Consumer Reports. You can actually read it for free online. It is very enlightening, particularly the section on opiates.  http://www.druglibrary.org/schaffer/Library/studies/cu/cumenu.htm
Optimistic nonsense. Nothing more. The idea of abiotic oil is a non-starter because even if there were some truth behind it the oil fields are still being drained much faster than they're refilled.
You should read the article, it's much less misleading than the Reddit headline.  He's basically arguing that there exist better sources of energy such as nuclear energy.  We could use electric cars based on nuclear energy, although he does admit it would be hard to wean aircraft from petro fuel.  He's not some moonbat arguing we should just stop using oil and start holding hands.
I hated emacs for turning my left little finger into a claw with all the damned CTRL keystrokes.  I railed about how evil/stupid do you have to be to make something like that.  Then I found out that the CTRL was (and still should be) where CAPSLOCK is.  I got ctrl2cap from sysinternals and life was forever happy. However, while I agree that emacs is a great operating sysetm it really could use a good editor.
I didn't realize you could do that. I may go with that option, though it might confuse users who look at the status bar and expect their click to open a link, rather than display a menu.
Wrongly crossposted to features.reddit.com. Voting down. Please crosspost responsibly... don't drink and crosspost.
To me, reddit isn't about discovering new stuff as much as discovering what you like.  Given the discussion about "voting" versus "training a filter" I prefer the filter training.  If I can take 5 seconds and mark something I read in 2000 as something I like or dislike, that's got benefit.  If it's brand new content, same thing. $0.02
That has the desired effect. Thanks.
Careful there, I feel a YHBT YHL HAND may be in your future ;)
Finite State Automata (FSAs) are a way of modeling theoretical computer tasks, or modeling theoretical languages. They were invented before modern computers. Deterministic and Non-Deterministic Finite State Automata (DFAs and NFAs, in my coursework) have different rules, but both can be used to represent the same problem sets/languages. They can solve certain regular expression matching problems. Regular Expressions are a common programming tool. Actual RegEx implementations in various programming languages are, to the best of my knowledge, based on these theoretical automata. Aside from NFAs and DFAs, there are Pushdown Automata (PDAs), Embedded Pushdown Automata (EPDAs), Deciders, Turing Machines, etc. all of which are useful for different discussions in computer science. Automata theory is also a major part of formal linguistics. I guess computer science sortof grew out of formal linguistics. Maybe someone else here is more educated about that.
the funniest blog that i have come across
Three reasons: 1. Parts of the page are already generated with Ruby. Writing Ruby that generates Javascript that generates HTML is one too many layers of generation if it can possibly be avoided.  2. Validation tools won't generally work with JS-generated HTML. This particular site needs to pass basic online validity and accessability checks.  3. The site has to work with browsers that don't support Javascript.
End-users click on ads or pay to use them?
If you can think of an extremely simple UI for this, I might agree. However, I'm not sure there is one... it's a lot of extra code, extra complexity, and extra effort for a very small gain... the ability to fix a transient title on an ephemeral link that has a 99% chance of vanishing off all the pages people see within 24 hours.
"features reddit" links to http://reddit.com/ "textless alien graphic" links to http://features.reddit.com/ Does not make sense! May I recommend **the whole logo link to the current subreddit** (as numerous people suggested it should in several feature requests) and **adding a "reddit.com" button to the right of "stats"**. ------ I am astonished that the geek legions disagree with me (or at least do not agree in larger numbers). The semantic nonsensicality of the current solution really irritates me.
Agreed, but this doesn't just apply to the outside community. I was allowed to choose my own tools on a smallish project for my employer, a very large company, and I ended up using Python with wxPython for GUI. As you said, the results speak for themselves.  The 'Guido Time Machine' allowed for impressive results with only me working on the project.  The previous version took many more people and more than twice as long to implement.  Immediately, the exposure of Python increased around the office, and people were considering it as an alternative for use in future projects.
This is an irritating article with a jumble of arguments that don't much pertain to the goal of ending the war on drugs.  Supposedly innocent bystanders and too many minorities going to jail are both side issues.  Both of these things happen with most types of crime.  They don't have a whole lot to do with what is wrong with the war on drugs.  Also, drug addicts and dealers are responsible for a majority of violent crime (especially if you include alcoholics).  This article tries to show that people who take drugs are mostly just hurting themselves.  This isn't true BECAUSE OF THE WAR ON DRUGS! That is the real argument.  The war on drugs CAUSES almost all of the problems we relate to drugs.  Why do people steal and murder to get more drugs?  Because drugs are expensive ,addictive, and illegal.  Legalizing recreational drug use will stop 2 of those 3 problems with obtaining and using drugs.  The addictive nature of drugs can be managed like it is now; by rehab and education.  Just think of all the money we would have to  manage drug use in the US if we ended all spending on the war on drugs and taxed recreational drug sales. Last argument:  Historically, prohibition has always started with ideas of creating a utopian society without social problems.  The argument for prohibition blams all that plagues us upon alcohol and drugs.  Can't society see the idiocy of this belief?  The historians among you need to look up some of the famous prohibitionists and their rhetoric to see how right I am.
Cooperation and kin altruism are essentially different from the type of altruism discussed in this study. Not because the mechanisms are different. The same mechanism might lead to cooperation, kin altruism, or non-reciprocal altruism, but there are different value propositions in all three categories. So it is worthwhile to examine all three categories separately. These toddlers are helping someone they don't know, who will not reward them, and will not be around long enough to form an alliance with. And yes, any parent could have told you this. But it's still neat.
it should be mentioned that this is talking about where to find original *historical* source documents, not original modern content 
The bacteria is, and it might even be winning.
I agree, but this has been requested before. Different words, same base request. See http://features.reddit.com/goto?id=23qq
indeed, so much wasted potential here 
I love Drupal, I've been looking forward to v5.7 for months!
This is true for *older* teachers who have already made significant investments in their teaching skillsets.  It's not true for younger teachers that can still switch to another profession. Among my cohort - people 1-2 years out of college - I've got a lot of friends that tried teaching for a year or two.  Most of them end up saying "I like it, but there's no way in hell I'm doing this for $30-40k a year for the rest of my life".  Then they go back to law school or get a job at a biotech firm or otherwise enter the decently-paid workforce. This is a major reason why the public education system sucks.  The labor price is fixed by political decisions.  That leaves the quality of employees as the only variables.  Those who can get higher-paying jobs in industry leave, unable to justify the low pay and long hours even if they do like it (unless they're a masochistic saint, but those are rare).  That leaves only the employees that industry doesn't want to teach our kids. The problem will likely get worse, because many of the retiring baby-boomer teachers entered the profession when there were glass ceilings that prevented otherwise-capable women from taking high-powered corporate jobs.  When my mom became a teacher in '68, it was almost unheard-of for a woman to be in senior management or a law partner or another high-paid position.  She became a teacher because that was what most smart, college-educated women did back then.  It was that or secretary (or in a few rare cases, journalist).  Now there's no glass ceiling, so my sister's going to be a petroleum geologist, my female friends are going to be doctors and lawyers, and a few are even looking at Wall Street careers.
I've never seen anybody who could use Windows and MS Office who couldn't get stuff done with Gnome and Openoffice without help. Usually, the only thing they need to be told is to save files in MS Office format. What I have seen is a lot of broken Windows boxes. It's fairly hard for a non-geek to keep a Windows machine running properly. Within a year, the norm is several pieces of malware and a badly fragmented hard drive.
Most of them also work 8-9 hours a day and then put in 2-3 hours of homework afterwards.  What other profession assigns homework?  Plus, they don't get to manage their own time like every other professional.  No surfing Reddit at work.  They're often lucky if they can take a bathroom break or make a phone call. I wish I knew where your uncle works.  The pay scale for elementary-school teachers in Weston, MA (one of the richest communities in the country) tops out at $80k.
Assuming you're replying to me, I was talking about undergraduate education, and not graduate studies. I believe most IIT students get in to US universities for graduate studies ( ofcourse with tuitition waiver and a fellowship ).  Moreover, IIRC the Infosys chairman was talking about undergraduate education. Getting tuition waiver/fellowship is a _lot_ harder for undergraduate than for graduate studies.
Coca Cola is a disguisting company. Good someone is finally standing up to them and trying to combat youth obesity. Their non-sugar drinks like coke zero contain a scary blend of caffine and the makings of the drug 'speed' - luckily they do have to label this, unluckily no kids realistically going to know the scientific name for these drugs, nor their parents
The article is informative if you ignore its attempt at pitting a modern day "amateur" with 1940's "pros", with subheadings like, "Amateurs One, Pros Zero"  This guy has the help of a network of distributed computers.  The pros back in 1940 did not - they had to rely on sheer genius. This is also a demonstration of why you need to put expiration dates on your own encryption keys.  What encryption technology is considered "safe" today may be totally inadequate 60 years from now.
This article is not economically sound.  Firstly, apple has no monopoly of any sort.  There are portable media players of all shapes and sizes selling briskly by numerous companies.  Second, the cost has stayed the same because the demand has allowed the processes to be developed that create larger storage, in smaller size, at a cheaper cost per unit.  There is no arbitrary limit to the amount of data a tiny harddrive can potentially hold in the future, and it is impossible to predict the future innovations Apple will inject into its portable media product line. The Walkman anology is not correct either.  While you can purchase a $15 portable cd player - they suck.   Any estimations regarding Apple's fall from the top are worthless speculation.
In Gmail, when you list your mail on a certain topic, say, News, then the items in that list that are also tagged with a different topic (like the Inbox, or Info, or Personal, or Work, or whatever other tags you've made) have their other tags listed in front of the subject, smaller and in a different color. An example screenshot I lifted from an old ZiffDavis review:  http://www.dotnet.com/~myrddin/GmailInbox.gif On that screenshot you can see the other categories the email was tagged as, like ZD General Mail, or Jan Miano. If you had been looking at the Jan Miano email, you would see the 'Inbox' tag... you don't see the tag of the one your in. That applies very clearly to reddit. If you are looking at a subreddit, like features, then you would not see the 'features' tag in front of every link. But if someone crossposted to the main group, you would see 'reddit' in front of the link. In the main reddit, looking at that same post, you would see 'features' in front of it. This makes crossposts extremely easy to spot, the purpose of the link is immediately clear, items that are not crossposted will not cause clutter. And anyone who has used gmail will be familiar with the mechanic. Plus, I trust that Gmail has put a lot of research into how clear this method is to users... so I suspect it's one of the best ways to portray crossposting.
Well, he doesn't say its the end of the story, he says it's the beginning. (And the law of conservation of energy is broader than just the 1st law of thermodynamics!)  A *lot* of the people interested in energy aren't strong in science, and the conservation of energy is a fundamental principal that must be understood to cut off a lot of harebrained thought.
I don't know.  I use emacs because I'm used to it and because that vi curve seems fairly accurate. I do have twenty or so emacsy things I do without even thinking and that I couldn't do as easily even in vi, but vi may be more consistent here and there. I don't use several things from emacs mainly because they just don't stick with me. Take things like search, regexp search, replace, and regexp replace. Two and a half of those are under key shortcuts (I didn't know for years *that* and *which*), the rest you have to meta-x for. It's almost intuitive, but not quite - they sound very much alike but are slightly inconsistent: after replace-string and replace-regexp I expect replace-query, not query-replace, and I have to think a few moments about which one of these I wanted in the first place. I still have no idea how to do a replace in just a section of text. I assume it's possible *somehow*, but it's easier to switch to kdevelop at that point and go 'Edit', 'Replace' after making a selection.  I suppose with so many functions it's just a fact of life, but I don't want to interrupt my editing just because emacs is so darn complex - that complexity is double-edged that way. There are things I have to spend a minute with tab completion with to just find. Yes, emacs is my friend, but it just seems like a case of Perl sometimes: If you use nothing else then it's simple (of course), but that's a completely moot point as that doesnt apply to the other ninety percent of people. 
People don't buy iPods because they're a great value for the money. They buy them because they're easy to use, stylish, and surrounded by an ecosystem of 3rd party accessories.
I'd read it.
Could you give an example of those "what some people call miracles"-things you have personally witnessed?
It is indeed pathetic, but maybe it's understandable from the standpoint of 'limited resources', let me explain: A language having more users means that the language also has more potential developers which can continue to improve the language and build it's libraries.  Perhaps Guido is worried about the rise of the 'R' language for this very reason? Or maybe it's all just plain old jealousy?  At any rate, these posts certainly seem to reveal a pettyness.
touché
The difference is that your proposal is based on users specifying similar links manually, while this one determines similarities based on user preferences.
Namely: The Complete New Yorker on DVD.  Bummer; I was hoping someone would buy it for me.
Exactly, a few years back when deciding between Python and Ruby it initially came down to the indentation issue so I ended up choosing Ruby (Now that I know Ruby well I'm glad I chose it for other reasons, like code blocks).  Pythonistas will holler about how indentation isn't a problem if you've got your editor set up correctly and that may well be true... The other thing to consider is that a language-culture that says "There's only one right way to do it!" is not going to be as appealing as a language culture that says "There are many ways to do it".  People like freedom and choice not preaching.  I suspect a lot of people are being turned off by all the preaching about "the one right way" that goes on in the Python community.
Or, How Not To Lie With Statistics
Actually, merely being web-based does make it interesting. Your argument, if it were valid, would imply that web-based mail programs like Hotmail or Gmail wouldn't be interesting to users.  That seems refutation enough.
Cattle prod strength is strong. Trust me. It does depend on where you put it, though, and it's almost inherently local. Also, the sort-of-suggestion that muscle spasm will keep you pressing it is sort of odd - thigh to fingers? It sounds like a story - but rooted it truth.
urban legend.  http://urbanlegends.about.com/library/bl_plug_in_air_freshener.htm  http://www.snopes.com/inboxer/household/glade.asp 
rams, we just pushed an update to address this. all of the js, html, and css are gzipped, and the js is in 2 &lt;link&gt;s instead of a dozen.
Most of his complaints are very real (I loathed the other students at my high school because they acted precisely like that), but he spends almost no significant effort on recommending a solution. Of course, that could be because this is an economic problem rather than purely educational.  Did you know there was a time when you could get a living wage job and even a long-term career without going to college?
which features in picassa are most important to you?
Fair enough.  I didn't see this one, because I searched for the word "comment". :) Y'all should go vote for this feature too.
Oh, I'll definitely agree with you there. I know Rails but I don't know Ruby...and that's kind of the problem that Rails brings to Ruby...it creates Rails programmers, not Ruby programmers. But any amount of interest is good interest.
another barrier to commoditization of this market is the one billion itunes sold. the proud owners of those billion itunes downloads will be buying a portable player that plays their music, not whichever one happens to be the cheapest, or even "best".
Good damn thing they pulled it.  I would've sued for slander against hacker-kind. 1.That guy in the pic doesn't look like a hacker or geek.  He is undoubtedly a Nerd of the sort not seen since "Back to the Future".  2.Everyone knows geeks make great boyfriends.
No, I see bookmarks as a list of sites that have info I might want to reference again.  As a matter fact, I hope they DON'T change. A watch list is a list of sites that I check periodically for changes.  In my Bookmarks menu I have these two types sorted into different lists, but I can't do that on Reddit.  So I'd rather have a seperate page.
You do not need to go to "elite-institutions" to achieve the goals that these kids have. There is no reason for them to bending over backwards to get into these schools.  Besides, the undergraduate education these institutions offer is overrated, you can get a good undergraduate education anywhere - you just need to be interested in learning. 
I've said it before, I'll say it again: If it comes down to Hillary vs. John McCain (it could), I'll either vote Green or McCain.
The walkman was a music player.  Today's ipods also play video and there is much room for improvement to maintain profitability for years to come.   1.  larger capacity  2.  larger screen  3.  Greater image quality  4.  Wi-Fi support  5.  I'm sure we could think of more As a music player, I agree the iPod is doomed to become 'typical'  As a video player, the iPod will continue to be successful thanks to the ever-changing video standards.   It's true, you can get a TV built to 1990 standards today for about $80 or less.  But the average price of a television is probably (I'm no economist, and don't care to look up the stats) increasing.  The price of high-end televisions is certainly increasing.   how many years until we get a flexible, expanding, plasma-quality touchscreen wi-fi capable iPod with a bluetooth antenna so that you can beam video directly to a compatible television?   certainly more than 3.
Isn't this sort of implied when the domain of the link is reddit?
A pretty shallow and overall dumb piece.  Everyone likes to point out things like "Canada has 1 trillion barrels of oil in the Alberta tar sands", which is, unfortunately, irrelevant.  What's important is at what rate can we produce oil from them, and how much energy does it take to get each barrel of oil?   If the oil fields are refilling abiotically, great - are they refilling at a rate of 80 million barrels a day (approx our current extraction rate)?  No?  It won't stop oil from going to $200/barrel then. If we have enough uranium to fulfill all our energy needs for the next million years, great - but can we build a nuclear power plant every day for the next 20 years to replace oil by then?  No? Oh well. Methane hydrates hold enough natural gas blah blah blah...  Can we extrac enough without  creating a runaway greenhouse effect? No?  *sigh* See, everything's got it's problems.  A ton of oil is no good unless you can turn it into usable oil at a rate of 80 million barrels/day (and increasing all the time...), and it also has to compete with the current ratio of energy out/energy in of 20+/1 we currently enjoy from pumping liquid oil.   An article that simply counts reserves and resources and concludes we're fine is just dumb.
I'd like to see something similar but based on Google Maps.
"Two and a half of those are under key shortcuts" Two and a half? In my emacs, all four are shortcuts: C-s search C-M-s  regexp search M-% replace C-M-%  regexp replace 
This sounds like a recommended page that is spcific to each link.  Interesting, but doesn't the recommended page sort of give you the same thing?
I don't think so, either.  My submit was meant as an experiment in choosing headlines. ;)
What does it do that iPhoto or Picasa doesn't?  In other words, why should anyone use it?
I disagree. Its nice that the alien takes you back to the subreddit and 'reddit' takes you back 'home'. If you think they should be the other way around thats fine.
I'm disappointed. I thought the Catholic Church knew better than that. It seems they're almost as bad as the protestants in the end. 
Let me tell you an inspiration story. I have a friend. He graduated with bachelors last year, not a very educated guy, not bright, but he has skills to make connections with people. He can walk up to anybody on the street and make a conversation with them. So, a month ago he's got a job which pays $75/hour ($150K/year). Remember, he just graduated with BS degree. How did he get the job? Dice, monster, craigslist, plus alot of talking with people, CEOs mostly.  Now, think, how many of those super-achievers will get $150K a year after Harward or Yale? I'm pretty sure, less than 1%.
Kaum zu glauben. Das Bild ist vom 11. Februar 2006. Und es sieht mittlerweile noch übler in den Städten aus, die keine private Müllabfuhr haben. 
I'm a UTF-8 guy baby!
Arguments for vi: 1)  It is pre-installed on more Unix and Unix-like systems than any other editor which makes learning it a good idea  2)  A vi guru can edit text at least as well as an emacs guru (emacs does allow one to perform a wider range of tasks however)  3)  O'Reilly sells more vi books than emacs books which probably means more people actually use it than emacs (so you're not so strange for wanting to learn vi)  4)  Paul Graham uses it for lisp coding.  Yes...that's right...lisp.
Certainly gives new meaning to someone being a beast in the ring...
To paraphrase the movie: The Tao of Steve. "Achieving things is over-rated. Look at Hitler: He achieved a lot.  But doesn't everyone wish that he had stayed home and smoked a bowl?"
Experts suck at predicting the future. See: http://www.newyorker.com/critics/books/articles/051205crbo_books1   (this was recently posted on reddit). McCarthy is dead-on about what he's writing about. If you can't show that his figures are wrong, chances are that you are wrong.
This article seems to imply that Harvard tries to weed out these kids who are only interested in achievement for achievement's sake, but if that's the case, they don't do a very good job.  I can tell you that a large percentage of the undergrads here are just like that.  While I'm sure these kids enjoy being The Best and will probably be very successful, I don't get the impression that they are particularly happy or well-rounded.  Granted, there are a lot of great people who graduate from Harvard (e.g. Chris of reddit fame), but I would be willing to bet that, overall, students are much happier and graduate with a better sense of who they are at schools like UVa (e.g. reddit's Steve and Alexis).
All of those things factor into the value, so they are a great value for the money :)
A different perspective on Utopia: Prohibition of drug sale &amp; use by the government is no different than parents prohibiting their children from doing such things.  Are parents "idiots" for limiting their children's freedom, even to legitimate indulgences?
Try this: http://pixoh.com/bookmarklet/
The iPod was always a design win, not a price win.  What would make people start choosing their players on different criteria than they have? And anyway, the nano is more important than the full-size.
The government is treating us like children? This is good?
Definitely. There's the tamagotchi-factor going on here. Plus, it'll obviously be marketed as "The fascinating new game from the creator of the The Sims" I mean, I had little interest in it until I saw this video, now I'm 100% sold. I'll be there buying it the first day, regardless... the marketing doesn't need to appeal to gamers anymore; they're all on board already. So they're free to spend 100% of the promotion budget on the MTV crowd.
I didn't mean to add this to the request subreddit, sorry. Not even sure what that actually is!
Best article I've read in a month.
I abhor the notion of parents micromanaging their children to be overachievers, but this seems a bit too hands-off for me: &gt; "In short, love and support them as they challenge and search for themselves, fulfill their dreams and become the people they choose to be." Love and support, I agree with, but the rest seems a bit Pollyanna-ish to me.  Since when do children know what's best for their long term interests?  (Or short term, for that matter)
Yes, the goverment has authority over its constituents like parents do over their children.  A government's primary duties are to protect their constituents and promote their health, as is reasonably possible.  Just like parents with children.
This seems very much like EVO for the SNES.  One of my favorites.
And there are a *lot* of people who feel like you.  I'm betting/hoping that the Ds will pick Warner or Richardson, but tradesports.com (the best predictor I know) says it is likely to be Hillary.
It runs on computers that you do not own or cannot install anything on.
The second GoYellow commercial is only funny when you know German. "Brötchen" are buns. But we all know that Asians can't use the letter "r". So they guy says "Blödchen". And "Blödchen" is a minimizatione of the Word "blöd" (= dumb). So he actually asks her if she is a dumb girl. :-) 
For that there is [F-Spot](http://f-spot.org/Main_Page).
The difference is the context. In the recommended page, the context is me (all of my preferences).  On a similarities list, the context would be a single link.  I think you'd get pretty different results. It also would allow users to see similar things regardless of whether they fit a user's preferences (ex. could allow someone to find stories similar to one they didn't like and rate those down as well).
Yeah, that's pretty cool.  Good job. 
You can do this in comments already.
Er, it doesn't work too well.  It doesn't seem to get all the images on a page, and on some pages it crashes Safari. And anyway, if a picture of mine is on the web, it's already been through iPhoto.
I've got a friend who dropped out of UIUC sophomore year and now, a year and a half out of college (before his would-be graduation date) is making $75/hr. In general, formal education is not nearly as important as people think it is.  Smart, motivated people tend to do well no matter where they go to college.
Since when do adults know what's best for their long term interests?  Let alone what's best for someone *else's* long term interests.
In general, parent love and care for their children.  They impose limit because children haven't yet learned enough to take care of themselves.  They are dependants on their parents for their well being.  It is ridiculous to say (all) grown adults haven't learned enough to take care of themselves .  The government is made up of those same adults.  It just so happen the adults that don't like drugs (for reason I don't understand).  The government is placing a certain narrow world view on others, limiting their freedom.  And then incarcerating to enforce that world view.
I think, here, he means *real* achievers, not the text-book pre-programmed kind.  Some of the most genuine, talented kind kids I grew up with had the least input from their parents, and were basically left to their own devices as they grew older.
I was going to post a comment here, but it required logging in, so I gave up.
1) Log in to reddit  2) Click on the hyperlink of your name in the top-right  3) If you've ever posted comments, they will be included in the list on the page that loads  4) Now, suppose you want to see what you were replying to, or who replied to you. How do you do that? Suggestion: add a context button under the post that takes you to the comments page for that article. Now you can see what everyone else posted, too.
well it works a treat for me. Can't find fault in this at all. Very easy to use. Does exactly what it says on the tin.
Except the bacteria is not an animal.
I resubmitted in case that one was "marked" completed by the devs.
WTF? Is reddit becoming a total waste of time? This site is ancient, highly referenced, useful, but NEW and RELEVANT? I don't think so. Should I go through my old links and post a few hundred of these? C'mon. First the story of MEL and then this in the same couple of days. Spare me the ancient links.
You may disagree with my recommendation, but I cannot see how you could possibly disagree with my observation. **Do you really find it makes sense that "features reddit" is the part that does NOT take you to features.reddit.com?** Oh... and no, I would not like it better the other way around.  That would be even worse.
Autocontrast and saturation. I've submitted the features to the reddit.
In the USA, we elect our representatives in government to be our voice.  When we elect our leaders, we are not empowering them to tell us what to do, we are empowering them to do our will.  The end result is similar.  I want health and safety standards, and I help elect people who will give me those, but I'm wary of the implications of thinking of our representatives as being in a parent-child relationship with us.
It is also ridiculous to ignore the fact that there are many grown adults who act irresponsibly and make irresponsible decisions. Sometimes a whole industry can spring up around a few people behaving badly, and the totality of this can be more harmful to the society than if the problem were just outlawed. You and I can dispute when a particular people problem and their consequences are enough to require legal prohibition, but I think the principle in and of itself is sound.
No. The government is not an independent entity, distinct from the people.  It is an organization of a limited number of people who are temporarily granted a few certain authorities (not rights) to carry out specific limited actions on behalf of the population as a whole. A government's primary responsibility is to maximize the individual freedom of each of the citizens who have, as the constituency, granted the government its temporary existence. As Barry Goldwater said so succinctly: "A government that is big enough to give you all you want is big enough to take it all away".
What source are you using for that figure? I used to work in uranium exploration, am a geology prof, and am kind of curious if you just pulled that number out of your ass, which is what it LOOKS like. Cause there is a HELL of a lot of uranium lying around (e.g. in northern Saskatchewan, in parts of west Africa, ...) Of course, given much of the argument here (including the very notion that being MR.LISP makes McCarthy somehow a pundit on energy) I suspect hot air is the real source of infinite energy around here...  
Wow, what a waste of time.  In math terms this is a silly parlor trick.  If you know, in advance, the exact probabilities this Fantasyland asset is going to follow until the end of the universe, you can devise any number of systems to optimize for it.   All this "system" does is jigger around the absolute amounts, knowing in advance the expected utility on every trade is 25% gain - the average of a 50% loss and a 100% gain.  Anyone will get rich if they find a magic savings account paying 25% compound interest forever... that's why there aren't any :) 
Like John Dvorak, he's a professional troll.  It's his job to draw outrage.
As an embittered victim of exactly this process, I believe I have a little insight into this process.  The goals that these kids have are many and varied, but many involve a graduate degree, and graduate school is vastly easier to get into if you attend the right undergraduate school. This is particularly true in CS, where graduate schools frequently *only* accept students from a handful of schools, with almost none coming from anywhere else (aside from international students). CS is an extreme case, but many top graduate schools, as well as law and medical schools also have this phenomenon to some degree.  So these people are rightfully stressed out about getting in. It's not something wrong with them that causes this. Instead, I fault the admissions departments at the top universities they're trying to get into. Admissions departments provide applications chock full of lists of line-item activities, the clear implication being that you are at a disadvantage if you can't overflow the lists with your many and varied "extracurricular activities." And the people who get in bear this out: every classmate I know who got into an Ivy had a nauseating number of useless, meaningless extracurriculars that they didn't care about.  They select for things like "community service" and sports and high school grades. By selecting for this, they cause the stressed-out overachievers to concentrate on meaningless activities.  My solution would be to change the criteria. First, throw out every dedicated admissions officer. None of them know anything other than how to make bullshit meaningless criteria. Split admissions departments into admissions for each area of study (engineering, science, humanities, etc), and staff each department with professors from that area of study. Professors know their area, and so they will recognize when applicants do something remarkable in that area, where dedicated admissions officers, clueless about every particular field, will be blind to achievements in any kind of technical field.  Then, change the criteria so that the most important thing is to have done something remarkable (an art project, a programming project, a history paper, an english paper, an engineering project) in the area being applied for. A report on or submission of that remarkable thing should be the central aspect of the application.
Or even just the number of them, like this: 2 points 40 minutes ago 1 reply
UVA has very competitive admissions. A better question is whether they be happier and graduate with a better sense of who they are at * State.
A briliantly constructed essay.
That doesn't sound quite right. According to this:  http://www.eia.doe.gov/emeu/international/electric.html  the annual world consumption (2003) is 14767 billion kWhe. A typical reactor is 700 MWe (6.13 billion kWhe), so that comes out to about 2400 reactors. Assuming a 50% utilization, that's only 4800 reactors total. Doubling the output to replace the energy used in transportation, we get 9600. Most plants have two or three reactors, for a grand total of 4000 plants. Not quite 12000. And that's replacing everything including coal and hydro. To put that in perspective, that's one plant per 1.75 million people. Even if every plant costs US$50G for a 30yr life that's only US$1k per capita per year -- a small burden for energy. A breeder burns up roughly 60 GWt * day / tonne U. Lets assume 33% efficiency and call that 20 GWe * day / tonne. That's 20 * 24 = 480 GWe * hr / tonne U, or 0.48 billion kWhe / tonne U. So 2 tonne U per billion kWhe.  So, 14767 billion kWh e * 2 is about 30,000 tonne U per year. There is about 10,000,000 tonne reserve or 300 years' worth. http://www.worldenergy.org/wec-geis/publications/reports/ser/uranium/uranium.asp http://www.uic.com.au/nip08.htm 
I don't recognize any rights whatsoever for the government.  I possess all rights and the government has none. I may choose to cooperate with the government.  I may choose to not cooperate.  I will make each decision in my life based on what I think is best. I am a free adult with my own mind and my own unique life of limited duration.  No one else has a right to control even one second of that life. What the government does have is the collective might, of the rest of the population, to try to make me toe the party line. Might does not make right.
I think "permalink" is what you're asking for. Click that from your comment list.
Also, here's an amusing article: http://www.ornl.gov/info/ornlreview/rev26-34/text/colmain.html "the energy content of nuclear fuel released in coal combustion is more than that of the coal consumed!"
He mentioned conservation of energy to dispel the ridiculous idea that you can power cars on hydrogen produced by the car, and feed it back to the car to produce more hydrogen.
